Ohio, session 136, HB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3517.01, 3517.08, 3517.10, 6
3517.102, 3517.105, 3517.106, 3517.107, 3517.13, 3599.03, 7
3921.22, and 4503.03 of the Revised Code be amended to read as 8
follows: 9
Sec. 3517.01. (A)(1) A political party within the meaning 10
of Title XXXV of the Revised Code is any group of voters that 11
meets either of the following requirements: 12
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, at the 13
most recent regular state election, the group polled for its 14
candidate for governor in the state or nominees for presidential 15
electors at least three per cent of the entire vote cast for 16
that office. A group that meets the requirements of this 17
division remains a political party for a period of four years 18
after meeting those requirements. 19

H. B. No. 250 Page 2
As Introduced
(b) The group filed with the secretary of state, 20
subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division 21
(A)(1)(a) of this section, a party formation petition that meets 22
all of the following requirements: 23
(i) The petition is signed by qualified electors equal in 24
number to at least one per cent of the total vote for governor 25
or nominees for presidential electors at the most recent 26
election for such office. 27
(ii) The petition is signed by not fewer than five hundred 28
qualified electors from each of at least a minimum of one-half 29
of the congressional districts in this state. If an odd number 30
of congressional districts exists in this state, the number of 31
districts that results from dividing the number of congressional 32
districts by two shall be rounded up to the next whole number. 33
(iii) The petition declares the petitioners' intention of 34
organizing a political party, the name of which shall be stated 35
in the declaration, and of participating in the succeeding 36
general election, held in even-numbered years, that occurs more 37
than one hundred twenty-five days after the date of filing. 38
(iv) The petition designates a committee of not less than 39
three nor more than five individuals of the petitioners, who 40
shall represent the petitioners in all matters relating to the 41
petition. Notice of all matters or proceedings pertaining to the 42
petition may be served on the committee, or any of them, either 43
personally or by registered mail, or by leaving such notice at 44
the usual place of residence of each of them. 45
(2) No such group of electors shall assume a name or 46
designation that is similar, in the opinion of the secretary of 47
state, to that of an existing political party as to confuse or 48

H. B. No. 250 Page 3
As Introduced
mislead the voters at an election. 49
(B) A campaign committee shall be legally liable for any 50
debts, contracts, or expenditures incurred or executed in its 51
name. 52
(C) Notwithstanding the definitions found in section 53
3501.01 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and 54
sections 3517.08 to 3517.14, 3517.99, and 3517.992 of the 55
Revised Code: 56
(1) "Campaign committee" means a candidate or a 57
combination of two or more persons authorized by a candidate 58
under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code to receive 59
contributions and make expenditures. 60
(2) "Campaign treasurer" means an individual appointed by 61
a candidate under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code. 62
(3) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in division (H) of 63
section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes any person 64
who, at any time before or after an election, receives 65
contributions or makes expenditures or other use of 66
contributions, has given consent for another to receive 67
contributions or make expenditures or other use of 68
contributions, or appoints a campaign treasurer, for the purpose 69
of bringing about the person's nomination or election to public 70
office. When two persons jointly seek the offices of governor 71
and lieutenant governor, "candidate" means the pair of 72
candidates jointly. "Candidate" does not include candidates for 73
election to the offices of member of a county or state central 74
committee, presidential elector, and delegate to a national 75
convention or conference of a political party. 76
(4) "Continuing association" means an association, other 77

H. B. No. 250 Page 4
As Introduced
than a campaign committee, political party, legislative campaign 78
fund, political contributing entity, or labor organization, that 79
is intended to be a permanent organization that has a primary 80
purpose other than supporting or opposing specific candidates, 81
political parties, or ballot issues, and that functions on a 82
regular basis throughout the year. "Continuing association" 83
includes organizations that are determined to be not organized 84
for profit under subsection 501 and that are described in 85
subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(6) of the Internal 86
Revenue Code. 87
(5) "Contribution" (4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in 88
divisions (C)(4)(b) to (d) of this section, "contribution" means 89
a loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, 90
advance, payment, or transfer of funds or anything of value, 91
including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or 92
testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any 93
person other than the person to whom the services are rendered 94
for the personal services of another person, which contribution 95
is made, received, or used for the purpose of influencing the 96
results of an election. Any 97
(b) Any loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, 98
donation, advance, payment, or transfer of funds or of anything 99
of value, including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or 100
testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any 101
campaign committee, political action committee, legislative 102
campaign fund, political party, political contributing entity, 103
or person other than the person to whom the services are 104
rendered for the personal services of another person, that is 105
made, received, or used by a state or county political party, 106
other than the moneys an entity may receive under sections 107
3517.101, 3517.1012, and 3517.1013 of the Revised Code, shall be 108

H. B. No. 250 Page 5
As Introduced
considered to be a "contribution" for the purpose of section 109
3517.10 of the Revised Code and shall be included on a statement 110
of contributions filed under that section. 111
(c)(i) "Contribution" does not include any has the meaning 112
defined in division (C)(4)(a) of this section with respect to 113
contributions made to or received by a political contributing 114
entity if that political contributing entity does all of the 115
following: 116
(I) Deposits in a separate account from its general funds 117
all loans, gifts, deposits, donations, advances, payments, or 118
transfers of funds or anything of value, including a transfer of 119
funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's 120
estate and the payment by any person other than the person to 121
whom the services are rendered for the personal services of 122
another person, that are made to or received by the political 123
contributing entity for the purpose of influencing the results 124
of an election; 125
(II) Does not transfer to that separate account any other 126
loans, gifts, deposits, donations, advances, payments, or 127
transfers of funds or anything of value, including a transfer of 128
funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's 129
estate and the payment by any person other than the person to 130
whom the services are rendered for the personal services of 131
another person, that are made to or received by the political 132
contributing entity; 133
(III) Makes contributions and expenditures only from that 134
separate account. 135
(ii) If a political contributing entity does not follow 136
the procedure described in division (C)(4)(c)(i) of this 137

H. B. No. 250 Page 6
As Introduced
section, then any loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of 138
indebtedness, donation, advance, payment, or transfer of funds 139
or anything of value, including a transfer of funds from an 140
inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's estate and the 141
payment by any person other than the person to whom the services 142
are rendered for the personal services of another person, that 143
is made to or received by the political contributing entity is 144
considered a contribution, regardless of whether it is made or 145
received for the purpose of influencing the results of an 146
election. 147
(d) None of the following are considered a contribution 148
under divisions (C)(4)(a) to (c) of this section: 149
(a) (i) Services provided without compensation by 150
individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on 151
behalf of a person; 152
(b) (ii) Ordinary home hospitality; 153
(c) (iii) The personal expenses of a volunteer paid for by 154
that volunteer campaign worker; 155
(d) (iv) Any gift given to an entity pursuant to section 156
3517.101 of the Revised Code; 157
(e) (v) Any contribution as defined in section 3517.1011 158
of the Revised Code that is made, received, or used to pay the 159
direct costs of producing or airing an electioneering 160
communication; 161
(f) (vi) Any gift given to a state or county political 162
party for the party's restricted fund under division (A)(2) of 163
section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code; 164
(g) (vii) Any gift given to a state political party for 165

H. B. No. 250 Page 7
As Introduced
deposit in a Levin account pursuant to section 3517.1013 of the 166
Revised Code. As used in this division, "Levin account" has the 167
same meaning as in that section. 168
(h) (viii) Any donation given to a transition fund under 169
section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. 170
(6) (5) "Expenditure" means the disbursement or use of a 171
contribution for the purpose of influencing the results of an 172
election or of making a charitable donation under division (G) 173
of section 3517.08 of the Revised Code. Any disbursement or use 174
of a contribution by a state or county political party is an 175
expenditure and shall be considered either to be made for the 176
purpose of influencing the results of an election or to be made 177
as a charitable donation under division (G) of section 3517.08 178
of the Revised Code and shall be reported on a statement of 179
expenditures filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 180
During the thirty days preceding a primary or general election, 181
any disbursement to pay the direct costs of producing or airing 182
a broadcast, cable, or satellite communication that refers to a 183
clearly identified candidate shall be considered to be made for 184
the purpose of influencing the results of that election and 185
shall be reported as an expenditure or as an independent 186
expenditure under section 3517.10 or 3517.105 of the Revised 187
Code, as applicable, except that the information required to be 188
reported regarding contributors for those expenditures or 189
independent expenditures shall be the same as the information 190
required to be reported under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of 191
section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. 192
As used in this division, "broadcast, cable, or satellite 193
communication" and "refers to a clearly identified candidate" 194
have the same meanings as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised 195

H. B. No. 250 Page 8
As Introduced
Code. 196
(7) (6) "Personal expenses" includes, but is not limited 197
to, ordinary expenses for accommodations, clothing, food, 198
personal motor vehicle or airplane, and home telephone. 199
(8) (7) "Political action committee" means a combination 200
of two or more persons, the primary or major purpose of which is 201
to support or oppose any candidate, political party, or issue, 202
or to influence the result of any election through express 203
advocacy, and that is not a political party, a campaign 204
committee, a political contributing entity, or a legislative 205
campaign fund. "Political action committee" does not include 206
either of the following: 207
(a) A continuing association that makes disbursements for 208
the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering 209
communications and that does not engage in express advocacy; 210
(b) A a political club that is formed primarily for social 211
purposes and that consists of one hundred members or less, has 212
officers and periodic meetings, has less than two thousand five 213
hundred dollars in its treasury at all times, and makes an 214
aggregate total contribution of one thousand dollars or less per 215
calendar year. 216
(9) (8) "Public office" means any state, county, 217
municipal, township, or district office, except an office of a 218
political party, that is filled by an election and the offices 219
of United States senator and representative. 220
(10) (9) "Anything of value" has the same meaning as in 221
section 1.03 of the Revised Code. 222
(11) (10) "Beneficiary of a campaign fund" means a 223
candidate, a public official or employee for whose benefit a 224

H. B. No. 250 Page 9
As Introduced
campaign fund exists, and any other person who has ever been a 225
candidate or public official or employee and for whose benefit a 226
campaign fund exists. 227
(12) (11) "Campaign fund" means money or other property, 228
including contributions. 229
(13) (12) "Public official or employee" has the same 230
meaning as in section 102.01 of the Revised Code. 231
(14) (13) "Caucus" means all of the members of the house 232
of representatives or all of the members of the senate of the 233
general assembly who are members of the same political party. 234
(15) (14) "Legislative campaign fund" means a fund that is 235
established as an auxiliary of a state political party and 236
associated with one of the houses of the general assembly. 237
(16) (15) "In-kind contribution" means anything of value 238
other than money that is used to influence the results of an 239
election or is transferred to or used in support of or in 240
opposition to a candidate, campaign committee, legislative 241
campaign fund, political party, political action committee, or 242
political contributing entity and that is made with the consent 243
of, in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at 244
the request or suggestion of the benefited candidate, committee, 245
fund, party, or entity. The financing of the dissemination, 246
distribution, or republication, in whole or part, of any 247
broadcast or of any written, graphic, or other form of campaign 248
materials prepared by the candidate, the candidate's campaign 249
committee, or their authorized agents is an in-kind contribution 250
to the candidate and an expenditure by the candidate. 251
(17) (16) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure 252
or other use of funds or anything of value by a person 253

H. B. No. 250 Page 10
As Introduced
advocating to advocate the election or defeat of an identified 254
candidate or candidates, that is not made with the consent of, 255
in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the 256
request or suggestion of any candidate or candidates or of the 257
campaign committee or agent of the candidate or candidates. As 258
used in division (C)(17) (C)(16) of this section: 259
(a) "Person" means an individual, partnership, 260
unincorporated business organization or association, political 261
action committee, political contributing entity, separate 262
segregated fund, association, or other organization or group of 263
persons, but not a labor organization or a corporation unless 264
the labor organization or corporation is a political 265
contributing entity. 266
(b) "Advocating" "Advocate" means to make any 267
communication containing a message advocating the election or 268
defeat of an identified candidate or candidates. 269
(c) "Identified candidate" means that the name of the 270
candidate appears, a photograph or drawing of the candidate 271
appears, or the identity of the candidate is otherwise apparent 272
by unambiguous reference. 273
(d) "Made in coordination, cooperation, or consultation 274
with, or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or the 275
campaign committee or agent of the candidate" means made 276
pursuant to any arrangement, coordination, or direction by the 277
candidate, the candidate's campaign committee, or the 278
candidate's agent prior to the publication, distribution, 279
display, or broadcast of the communication. An expenditure is 280
presumed to be so made when it is any of the following: 281
(i) Based on information about the candidate's plans, 282

H. B. No. 250 Page 11
As Introduced
projects, or needs provided to the person making the expenditure 283
by the candidate, or by the candidate's campaign committee or 284
agent, with a view toward having an expenditure made; 285
(ii) Made by or through any person who is, or has been, 286
authorized to raise or expend funds, who is, or has been, an 287
officer of the candidate's campaign committee, or who is, or has 288
been, receiving any form of compensation or reimbursement from 289
the candidate or the candidate's campaign committee or agent; 290
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of 291
section 3517.105 of the Revised Code, made by a political party 292
in support of a candidate, unless the expenditure is made by a 293
political party to conduct voter registration or voter education 294
efforts. 295
(e) "Agent" means any person who has actual oral or 296
written authority, either express or implied, to make or to 297
authorize the making of expenditures on behalf of a candidate, 298
or means any person who has been placed in a position with the 299
candidate's campaign committee or organization such that it 300
would reasonably appear that in the ordinary course of campaign- 301
related activities the person may authorize expenditures. 302
(18) (17) "Labor organization" means a labor union; an 303
employee organization; a federation of labor unions, groups, 304
locals, or other employee organizations; an auxiliary of a labor 305
union, employee organization, or federation of labor unions, 306
groups, locals, or other employee organizations; or any other 307
bona fide organization in which employees participate and that 308
exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with 309
employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours, 310
and other terms and conditions of employment. 311

H. B. No. 250 Page 12
As Introduced
(19) (18) "Separate segregated fund" means a separate 312
segregated fund established pursuant to the Federal Election 313
Campaign Act. 314
(20) (19) "Federal Election Campaign Act" means the 315
"Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971," 86 Stat. 11, 2 U.S.C.A. 316
431, et seq., as amended. 317
(21) (20) "Restricted fund" means the fund a state or 318
county political party must establish under division (A)(1) of 319
section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code. 320
(22) (21) "Electioneering communication" has the same 321
meaning as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. 322
(23) (22) "Express advocacy" means a communication that 323
contains express words advocating the nomination, election, or 324
defeat of a candidate or that contains express words advocating 325
the adoption or defeat of a question or issue, as determined by 326
a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. 327
(24) (23) "Political committee" has the same meaning as in 328
section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. 329
(25) (24) "Political contributing entity" means any 330
entity, including a corporation or, labor organization, 331
partnership, or unincorporated business organization or 332
association, that may lawfully make makes contributions and or 333
expenditures and that is not an individual or a political action 334
committee, continuing association, campaign committee, political 335
party, legislative campaign fund, designated state campaign 336
committee, or state candidate fund. For purposes of this 337
division, "lawfully" means not prohibited by any section of the 338
Revised Code, or authorized by a final judgment of a court of 339
competent jurisdiction. 340

H. B. No. 250 Page 13
As Introduced
(26) (25) "Internet identifier of record" has the same 341
meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. 342
Sec. 3517.08. (A) The personal expenses of a candidate 343
paid for by the candidate, from the candidate's personal funds, 344
shall not be considered as a contribution by or an expenditure 345
by the candidate and shall not be reported under section 3517.10 346
of the Revised Code. 347
(B)(1) An expenditure by a political action committee or a 348
political contributing entity shall not be considered a 349
contribution by the political action committee or the political 350
contributing entity or an expenditure by or on behalf of the 351
candidate if the purpose of the expenditure is to inform only 352
its members by means of mailed publications of its activities or 353
endorsements. 354
(2) An expenditure by a political party shall not be 355
considered a contribution by the political party or an 356
expenditure by or on behalf of the candidate if the purpose of 357
the expenditure is to inform predominantly the party's members 358
by means of mailed publications or other direct communication of 359
its activities or endorsements, or for voter contact such as 360
sample ballots, absent voter's ballots application mailings, 361
voter registration, or get-out-the-vote activities. 362
(C) An expenditure by a continuing association, political 363
contributing entity, or political party shall not be considered 364
a contribution to any campaign committee or an expenditure by or 365
on behalf of any campaign committee if the purpose of the 366
expenditure is for the staff and maintenance of the continuing 367
association's, political contributing entity's, or political 368
party's headquarters, or for a political poll, survey, index, or 369
other type of measurement not on behalf of a specific candidate. 370

H. B. No. 250 Page 14
As Introduced
(D) The expenses of maintaining a constituent office paid 371
for, from the candidate's personal funds, by a candidate who is 372
a member of the general assembly at the time of the election 373
shall not be considered a contribution by or an expenditure by 374
or on behalf of the candidate, and shall not be reported, if the 375
constituent office is not used for any candidate's campaign 376
activities. 377
(E) The net contribution of each social or fund-raising 378
activity shall be calculated by totaling all contributions to 379
the activity minus the expenditures made for the activity. 380
(F) An expenditure that purchases goods or services shall 381
be attributed to an election when the disbursement of funds is 382
made, rather than at the time the goods or services are used. 383
The secretary of state, under the procedures of Chapter 119. of 384
the Revised Code, shall establish rules for the attribution of 385
expenditures to a candidate when the candidate is a candidate 386
for more than one office during a reporting period and for 387
expenditures made in a year in which no election is held. The 388
secretary of state shall further define by rule those 389
expenditures that are or are not by or on behalf of a candidate. 390
(G) An expenditure for the purpose of a charitable 391
donation may be made if it is made to an organization that is 392
exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and 393
described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(8), 501(c) 394
(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code or is approved 395
by advisory opinion of the Ohio elections commission as a 396
legitimate charitable organization. Each expenditure under this 397
division shall be separately itemized on statements made 398
pursuant to section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 399
Sec. 3517.10. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this 400

H. B. No. 250 Page 15
As Introduced
division, every campaign committee, political action committee, 401
legislative campaign fund, political party, and political 402
contributing entity that made or received a contribution or made 403
an expenditure in connection with the nomination or election of 404
any candidate or in connection with any ballot issue or question 405
at any election held or to be held in this state shall file, on 406
a form prescribed under this section or by electronic means of 407
transmission as provided in this section and section 3517.106 of 408
the Revised Code, a full, true, and itemized statement, made 409
under penalty of election falsification, setting forth in detail 410
the contributions and expenditures, not later than four p.m. of 411
the following dates: 412
(1) The twelfth day before the election to reflect 413
contributions received and expenditures made from the close of 414
business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed 415
statement, if any, to the close of business on the twentieth day 416
before the election; 417
(2) The thirty-eighth day after the election to reflect 418
the contributions received and expenditures made from the close 419
of business on the last day reflected in the last previously 420
filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the seventh 421
day before the filing of the statement; 422
(3) The last business day of January of every year to 423
reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from 424
the close of business on the last day reflected in the last 425
previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on 426
the last day of December of the previous year; 427
(4) The last business day of July of every year to reflect 428
the contributions received and expenditures made from the close 429
of business on the last day reflected in the last previously 430

H. B. No. 250 Page 16
As Introduced
filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the last 431
day of June of that year. 432
A campaign committee shall only be required to file the 433
statements prescribed under divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this 434
section in connection with the nomination or election of the 435
committee's candidate. 436
The statement required under division (A)(1) of this 437
section shall not be required of any campaign committee, 438
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 439
party, or political contributing entity that has received 440
contributions of less than one thousand dollars and has made 441
expenditures of less than one thousand dollars at the close of 442
business on the twentieth day before the election. Those 443
contributions and expenditures shall be reported in the 444
statement required under division (A)(2) of this section. 445
If an election to select candidates to appear on the 446
general election ballot is held within sixty days before a 447
general election, the campaign committee of a successful 448
candidate in the earlier election may file the statement 449
required by division (A)(1) of this section for the general 450
election instead of the statement required by division (A)(2) of 451
this section for the earlier election if the pregeneral election 452
statement reflects the status of contributions and expenditures 453
for the period twenty days before the earlier election to twenty 454
days before the general election. 455
If a person becomes a candidate less than twenty days 456
before an election, the candidate's campaign committee is not 457
required to file the statement required by division (A)(1) of 458
this section. 459

H. B. No. 250 Page 17
As Introduced
No statement under division (A)(3) of this section shall 460
be required for any year in which a campaign committee, 461
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 462
party, or political contributing entity is required to file a 463
postgeneral election statement under division (A)(2) of this 464
section. However, a statement under division (A)(3) of this 465
section may be filed, at the option of the campaign committee, 466
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 467
party, or political contributing entity. 468
No campaign committee of a candidate for the office of 469
chief justice or justice of the supreme court, and no campaign 470
committee of a candidate for the office of judge of any court in 471
this state, shall be required to file a statement under division 472
(A)(4) of this section. 473
Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and in the 474
next paragraph of this section, the only campaign committees 475
required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this 476
section are the campaign committee of a statewide candidate and 477
the campaign committee of a candidate for county office. The 478
campaign committee of a candidate for any other nonjudicial 479
office is required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of 480
this section if that campaign committee receives, during that 481
period, contributions exceeding ten thousand dollars. 482
No statement under division (A)(4) of this section shall 483
be required of a campaign committee, a political action 484
committee, a legislative campaign fund, a political party, or a 485
political contributing entity for any year in which the campaign 486
committee, political action committee, legislative campaign 487
fund, political party, or political contributing entity is 488
required to file a postprimary election statement under division 489

H. B. No. 250 Page 18
As Introduced
(A)(2) of this section. However, a statement under division (A) 490
(4) of this section may be filed at the option of the campaign 491
committee, political action committee, legislative campaign 492
fund, political party, or political contributing entity. 493
No statement under division (A)(3) or (4) of this section 494
shall be required if the campaign committee, political action 495
committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or 496
political contributing entity has no contributions that it has 497
received and no expenditures that it has made since the last 498
date reflected in its last previously filed statement. However, 499
the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative 500
campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity 501
shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed 502
under this section and made under penalty of election 503
falsification, on the date required in division (A)(3) or (4) of 504
this section, as applicable. 505
The campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file 506
a monthly statement of contributions received during each of the 507
months of July, August, and September in the year of the general 508
election in which the candidate seeks office. The campaign 509
committee of a statewide candidate shall file the monthly 510
statement not later than three business days after the last day 511
of the month covered by the statement. During the period 512
beginning on the nineteenth day before the general election in 513
which a statewide candidate seeks election to office and 514
extending through the day of that general election, each time 515
the campaign committee of the joint candidates for the offices 516
of governor and lieutenant governor or of a candidate for the 517
office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of 518
state, or attorney general receives a contribution from a 519
contributor that causes the aggregate amount of contributions 520

H. B. No. 250 Page 19
As Introduced
received from that contributor during that period to equal or 521
exceed ten thousand dollars and each time the campaign committee 522
of a candidate for the office of chief justice or justice of the 523
supreme court receives a contribution from a contributor that 524
causes the aggregate amount of contributions received from that 525
contributor during that period to exceed ten thousand dollars, 526
the campaign committee shall file a two-business-day statement 527
reflecting that contribution. Contributions reported on a two- 528
business-day statement required to be filed by a campaign 529
committee of a statewide candidate in a primary election shall 530
also be included in the postprimary election statement required 531
to be filed by that campaign committee under division (A)(2) of 532
this section. A two-business-day statement required by this 533
paragraph shall be filed not later than two business days after 534
receipt of the contribution. The statements required by this 535
paragraph shall be filed in addition to any other statements 536
required by this section. 537
Subject to the secretary of state having implemented, 538
tested, and verified the successful operation of any system the 539
secretary of state prescribes pursuant to divisions (C)(6)(b) 540
and (D)(6) of this section and division (F)(1) of section 541
3517.106 of the Revised Code for the filing of campaign finance 542
statements by electronic means of transmission, a campaign 543
committee of a statewide candidate shall file a two-business-day 544
statement under the preceding paragraph by electronic means of 545
transmission if the campaign committee is required to file a 546
pre-election, postelection, or monthly statement of 547
contributions and expenditures by electronic means of 548
transmission under this section or section 3517.106 of the 549
Revised Code. 550
If a campaign committee or political action committee has 551

H. B. No. 250 Page 20
As Introduced
no balance on hand and no outstanding obligations and desires to 552
terminate itself, it shall file a statement to that effect, on a 553
form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of 554
election falsification, with the official with whom it files a 555
statement under division (A) of this section after filing a 556
final statement of contributions and a final statement of 557
expenditures, if contributions have been received or 558
expenditures made since the period reflected in its last 559
previously filed statement. 560
(B) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(7) of 561
this section, each statement required by division (A) of this 562
section shall contain the following information: 563
(1) The full name and address of each campaign committee, 564
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 565
party, or political contributing entity, including any treasurer 566
of the committee, fund, party, or entity, filing a contribution 567
and expenditure statement; 568
(2)(a) In the case of a campaign committee, the 569
candidate's full name and address; 570
(b) In the case of a political action committee, the 571
registration number assigned to the committee under division (D) 572
(1) of this section; 573
(c) In the case of a political contributing entity that is 574
a corporation or unincorporated business, all of the following: 575
(i) The name of each officer, director, principal 576
shareholder, partner, owner, or member of the corporation or 577
unincorporated business; 578
(ii) If the corporation or unincorporated business is 579
controlled by a corporation or unincorporated business, the name 580

H. B. No. 250 Page 21
As Introduced
of the controlling corporation or unincorporated business and 581
the name of each officer, director, principal shareholder, 582
partner, owner, or member of the controlling corporation or 583
unincorporated business. For purposes of this division, a 584
corporation or unincorporated business is deemed to control 585
another corporation or unincorporated business if the 586
corporation or unincorporated business, directly or indirectly, 587
or acting through one or more persons or entities, owns, 588
controls, or has the power to vote fifty per cent or more of any 589
class of voting securities of the other corporation or 590
unincorporated business. 591
(3) The date of the election and whether it was or will be 592
a general, primary, or special election; 593
(4) A statement of contributions received, which shall 594
include the following information: 595
(a) The month, day, and year of the contribution; 596
(b)(i) The full name and address of each person, political 597
party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political 598
action committee, or political contributing entity from whom 599
contributions are received and the registration number assigned 600
to the political action committee under division (D)(1) of this 601
section. The requirement of filing the full address does not 602
apply to any statement filed by a state or local committee of a 603
political party, to a finance committee of such committee, or to 604
a committee recognized by a state or local committee as its 605
fund-raising auxiliary. Notwithstanding division (F) of this 606
section, the requirement of filing the full address shall be 607
considered as being met if the address filed is the same address 608
the contributor provided under division (E)(1) of this section. 609

H. B. No. 250 Page 22
As Introduced
(ii) If a political action committee, political 610
contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political 611
party that is required to file campaign finance statements by 612
electronic means of transmission under section 3517.106 of the 613
Revised Code or a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or 614
candidate for the office of member of the general assembly 615
receives a contribution from an individual that exceeds one 616
hundred dollars, the name of the individual's current employer, 617
if any, or, if the individual is self-employed, the individual's 618
occupation and the name of the individual's business, if any; 619
(iii) If a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or 620
candidate for the office of member of the general assembly 621
receives a contribution transmitted pursuant to section 3599.031 622
of the Revised Code from amounts deducted from the wages and 623
salaries of two or more employees that exceeds in the aggregate 624
one hundred dollars during any one filing period under division 625
(A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section, the full name of the 626
employees' employer and the full name of the labor organization 627
of which the employees are members, if any. 628
(c) A description of the contribution received, if other 629
than money; 630
(d) The value in dollars and cents of the contribution; 631
(e) A separately itemized account of all contributions and 632
expenditures regardless of the amount, except a receipt of a 633
contribution from a person in the sum of twenty-five dollars or 634
less at one social or fund-raising activity and a receipt of a 635
contribution transmitted pursuant to section 3599.031 of the 636
Revised Code from amounts deducted from the wages and salaries 637
of employees if the contribution from the amount deducted from 638
the wages and salary of any one employee is twenty-five dollars 639

H. B. No. 250 Page 23
As Introduced
or less aggregated in a calendar year. An account of the total 640
contributions from each social or fund-raising activity shall 641
include a description of and the value of each in-kind 642
contribution received at that activity from any person who made 643
one or more such contributions whose aggregate value exceeded 644
two hundred fifty dollars and shall be listed separately, 645
together with the expenses incurred and paid in connection with 646
that activity. A campaign committee, political action committee, 647
legislative campaign fund, political party, or political 648
contributing entity shall keep records of contributions from 649
each person in the amount of twenty-five dollars or less at one 650
social or fund-raising activity and contributions from amounts 651
deducted under section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from the 652
wages and salary of each employee in the amount of twenty-five 653
dollars or less aggregated in a calendar year. No continuing 654
association political contributing entity that is recognized by 655
a state or local committee of a political party as an auxiliary 656
of the party and that makes a contribution from funds derived 657
solely from regular dues paid by members of the auxiliary shall 658
be required to list the name or address of any members who paid 659
those dues. 660
Contributions that are other income shall be itemized 661
separately from all other contributions. The information 662
required under division (B)(4) of this section shall be provided 663
for all other income itemized. As used in this paragraph, "other 664
income" means a loan, investment income, or interest income. 665
(f) In the case of a campaign committee of a state elected 666
officer, if a person doing business with the state elected 667
officer in the officer's official capacity makes a contribution 668
to the campaign committee of that officer, the information 669
required under division (B)(4) of this section in regard to that 670

H. B. No. 250 Page 24
As Introduced
contribution, which shall be filed together with and considered 671
a part of the committee's statement of contributions as required 672
under division (A) of this section but shall be filed on a 673
separate form provided by the secretary of state. As used in 674
this division: 675
(i) "State elected officer" has the same meaning as in 676
section 3517.092 of the Revised Code. 677
(ii) "Person doing business" means a person or an officer 678
of an entity who enters into one or more contracts with a state 679
elected officer or anyone authorized to enter into contracts on 680
behalf of that officer to receive payments for goods or 681
services, if the payments total, in the aggregate, more than 682
five thousand dollars during a calendar year. 683
(5) A statement of expenditures which shall include the 684
following information: 685
(a) The month, day, and year of the expenditure; 686
(b) The full name and address of each person, political 687
party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political 688
action committee, or political contributing entity to whom the 689
expenditure was made and the registration number assigned to the 690
political action committee under division (D)(1) of this 691
section; 692
(c) The object or purpose for which the expenditure was 693
made; 694
(d) The amount of each expenditure. 695
(C)(1) The statement of contributions and expenditures 696
shall be signed by the person completing the form. If a 697
statement of contributions and expenditures is filed by 698

H. B. No. 250 Page 25
As Introduced
electronic means of transmission pursuant to this section or 699
section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, the electronic signature 700
of the person who executes the statement and transmits the 701
statement by electronic means of transmission, as provided in 702
division (F) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, shall be 703
attached to or associated with the statement and shall be 704
binding on all persons and for all purposes under the campaign 705
finance reporting law as if the signature had been handwritten 706
in ink on a printed form. 707
(2) The person filing the statement, under penalty of 708
election falsification, shall include with it a list of each 709
anonymous contribution, the circumstances under which it was 710
received, and the reason it cannot be attributed to a specific 711
donor. 712
(3) Each statement of a campaign committee of a candidate 713
who holds public office shall contain a designation of each 714
contributor who is an employee in any unit or department under 715
the candidate's direct supervision and control. In a space 716
provided in the statement, the person filing the statement shall 717
affirm that each such contribution was voluntarily made. 718
(4) A campaign committee that did not receive 719
contributions or make expenditures in connection with the 720
nomination or election of its candidate shall file a statement 721
to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made 722
under penalty of election falsification, on the date required in 723
division (A)(2) of this section. 724
(5) The campaign committee of any person who attempts to 725
become a candidate and who, for any reason, does not become 726
certified in accordance with Title XXXV of the Revised Code for 727
placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or 728

H. B. No. 250 Page 26
As Introduced
special election to be held in this state, and who, at any time 729
prior to or after an election, receives contributions or makes 730
expenditures, or has given consent for another to receive 731
contributions or make expenditures, for the purpose of bringing 732
about the person's nomination or election to public office, 733
shall file the statement or statements prescribed by this 734
section and a termination statement, if applicable. Division (C) 735
(5) of this section does not apply to any person with respect to 736
an election to the offices of member of a county or state 737
central committee, presidential elector, or delegate to a 738
national convention or conference of a political party. 739
(6)(a) The statements required to be filed under this 740
section shall specify the balance in the hands of the campaign 741
committee, political action committee, legislative campaign 742
fund, political party, or political contributing entity and the 743
disposition intended to be made of that balance. 744
(b) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for 745
all statements required to be filed under this section and shall 746
furnish the forms to the boards of elections in the several 747
counties. The boards of elections shall supply printed copies of 748
those forms without charge. The secretary of state shall 749
prescribe the appropriate methodology, protocol, and data file 750
structure for statements required or permitted to be filed by 751
electronic means of transmission to the secretary of state or a 752
board of elections under division (A) of this section, division 753
(E) of section 3517.106, division (D) of section 3517.1011, 754
division (B) of section 3517.1012, division (C) of section 755
3517.1013, and divisions (D) and (I) of section 3517.1014 of the 756
Revised Code. Subject to division (A) of this section, division 757
(E) of section 3517.106, division (D) of section 3517.1011, 758
division (B) of section 3517.1012, division (C) of section 759

H. B. No. 250 Page 27
As Introduced
3517.1013, and divisions (D) and (I) of section 3517.1014 of the 760
Revised Code, the statements required to be stored on computer 761
by the secretary of state under division (B) of section 3517.106 762
of the Revised Code shall be filed in whatever format the 763
secretary of state considers necessary to enable the secretary 764
of state to store the information contained in the statements on 765
computer. Any such format shall be of a type and nature that is 766
readily available to whoever is required to file the statements 767
in that format. 768
(c) The secretary of state shall assess the need for 769
training regarding the filing of campaign finance statements by 770
electronic means of transmission and regarding associated 771
technologies for candidates, campaign committees, political 772
action committees, legislative campaign funds, political 773
parties, or political contributing entities, for individuals, 774
partnerships, or other entities, for persons making 775
disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing 776
electioneering communications, or for treasurers of transition 777
funds, required or permitted to file statements by electronic 778
means of transmission under this section or section 3517.105, 779
3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the 780
Revised Code. If, in the opinion of the secretary of state, 781
training in these areas is necessary, the secretary of state 782
shall arrange for the provision of voluntary training programs 783
for candidates, campaign committees, political action 784
committees, legislative campaign funds, political parties, or 785
political contributing entities, for individuals, partnerships, 786
and other entities, for persons making disbursements to pay the 787
direct costs of producing or airing electioneering 788
communications, or for treasurers of transition funds, as 789
appropriate. 790

H. B. No. 250 Page 28
As Introduced
(7) Each monthly statement and each two-business-day 791
statement required by division (A) of this section shall contain 792
the information required by divisions (B)(1) to (4), (C)(2), 793
and, if appropriate, (C)(3) of this section. Each statement 794
shall be signed as required by division (C)(1) of this section. 795
(D)(1)(a) Prior to receiving a contribution or making an 796
expenditure, every campaign committee, political action 797
committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or 798
political contributing entity shall appoint a treasurer and 799
shall file, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a 800
designation of that appointment, including the full name and 801
address of the treasurer and of the campaign committee, 802
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 803
party, or political contributing entity. That designation shall 804
be filed with the official with whom the campaign committee, 805
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 806
party, or political contributing entity is required to file 807
statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. The name 808
of a campaign committee shall include at least the last name of 809
the campaign committee's candidate. If two or more candidates 810
are the beneficiaries of a single campaign committee under 811
division (B) of section 3517.081 of the Revised Code, the name 812
of the campaign committee shall include at least the last name 813
of each candidate who is a beneficiary of that campaign 814
committee. The secretary of state shall assign a registration 815
number to each political action committee that files a 816
designation of the appointment of a treasurer under this 817
division if the political action committee is required by 818
division (A)(1) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code to file 819
the statements prescribed by this section with the secretary of 820
state. 821

H. B. No. 250 Page 29
As Introduced
(b) The secretary of state shall not accept for filing a 822
designation of treasurer of a political action committee or 823
political contributing entity if, in the opinion of the 824
secretary of state, the name of the political action committee 825
or political contributing entity would lead a reasonable person 826
to believe that the political action committee or political 827
contributing entity acts on behalf of or represents a county 828
political party, unless the designation is accompanied by a 829
written statement, signed by the chairperson of the county 830
political party's executive committee, granting the political 831
action committee or political contributing entity permission to 832
act on behalf of or represent the county political party. 833
(2) The treasurer appointed under division (D)(1) of this 834
section shall keep a strict account of all contributions, from 835
whom received and the purpose for which they were disbursed. 836
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.108 of 837
the Revised Code, a campaign committee shall deposit all 838
monetary contributions received by the committee into an account 839
separate from a personal or business account of the candidate or 840
campaign committee. 841
(b) A political action committee shall deposit all 842
monetary contributions received by the committee into an account 843
separate from all other funds. 844
(c) A state or county political party may establish a 845
state candidate fund that is separate from all other funds. A 846
state or county political party may deposit into its state 847
candidate fund any amounts of monetary contributions that are 848
made to or accepted by the political party subject to the 849
applicable limitations, if any, prescribed in section 3517.102 850
of the Revised Code. A state or county political party shall 851

H. B. No. 250 Page 30
As Introduced
deposit all other monetary contributions received by the party 852
into one or more accounts that are separate from its state 853
candidate fund. 854
(d) Each state political party shall have only one 855
legislative campaign fund for each house of the general 856
assembly. Each such fund shall be separate from any other funds 857
or accounts of that state party. A legislative campaign fund is 858
authorized to receive contributions and make expenditures for 859
the primary purpose of furthering the election of candidates who 860
are members of that political party to the house of the general 861
assembly with which that legislative campaign fund is 862
associated. Each legislative campaign fund shall be administered 863
and controlled in a manner designated by the caucus. As used in 864
this division, "caucus" has the same meaning as in section 865
3517.01 of the Revised Code and includes, as an ex officio 866
member, the chairperson of the state political party with which 867
the caucus is associated or that chairperson's designee. 868
(4) Every expenditure in excess of twenty-five dollars 869
shall be vouched for by a receipted bill, stating the purpose of 870
the expenditure, that shall be filed with the statement of 871
expenditures. A canceled check with a notation of the purpose of 872
the expenditure is a receipted bill for purposes of division (D) 873
(4) of this section. 874
(5) The secretary of state or the board of elections, as 875
the case may be, shall issue a receipt for each statement filed 876
under this section and shall preserve a copy of the receipt for 877
a period of at least six years. All statements filed under this 878
section shall be open to public inspection in the office where 879
they are filed and shall be carefully preserved for a period of 880
at least six years after the year in which they are filed. 881

H. B. No. 250 Page 31
As Introduced
(6) The secretary of state, by rule adopted pursuant to 882
section 3517.23 of the Revised Code, shall prescribe both of the 883
following: 884
(a) The manner of immediately acknowledging, with date and 885
time received, and preserving the receipt of statements that are 886
transmitted by electronic means of transmission to the secretary 887
of state or a board of elections pursuant to this section or 888
section 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 889
of the Revised Code; 890
(b) The manner of preserving the contribution and 891
expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and 892
disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and 893
disbursement information in the statements described in division 894
(D)(6)(a) of this section. The secretary of state shall preserve 895
the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, 896
deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and 897
disbursement information in those statements for at least ten 898
years after the year in which they are filed by electronic means 899
of transmission. 900
(7)(a) The secretary of state, pursuant to division (G) of 901
section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, shall make available 902
online to the public through the internet the contribution and 903
expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and 904
disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and 905
disbursement information in all of the following documents: 906
(i) All statements, all addenda, amendments, or other 907
corrections to statements, and all amended statements filed with 908
the secretary of state by electronic or other means of 909
transmission under this section, division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) 910
of section 3517.105, or section 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 911

H. B. No. 250 Page 32
As Introduced
3517.1013, 3517.1014, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code; 912
(ii) All statements filed with a board of elections by 913
electronic means of transmission, and all addenda, amendments, 914
corrections, and amended versions of those statements, filed 915
with the board under this section, division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2) 916
(b) of section 3517.105, or section 3517.106, 3517.1012, or 917
3517.11 of the Revised Code. 918
(b) The secretary of state may remove the information from 919
the internet after a reasonable period of time. 920
(E)(1) Any person, political party, campaign committee, 921
legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or 922
political contributing entity that makes a contribution in 923
connection with the nomination or election of any candidate or 924
in connection with any ballot issue or question at any election 925
held or to be held in this state shall provide its full name and 926
address to the recipient of the contribution at the time the 927
contribution is made. The political action committee also shall 928
provide the registration number assigned to the committee under 929
division (D)(1) of this section to the recipient of the 930
contribution at the time the contribution is made. 931
(2) Any individual who makes a contribution that exceeds 932
one hundred dollars to a political action committee, political 933
contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political 934
party or to a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or 935
candidate for the office of member of the general assembly shall 936
provide the name of the individual's current employer, if any, 937
or, if the individual is self-employed, the individual's 938
occupation and the name of the individual's business, if any, to 939
the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution 940
is made. Sections 3599.39 and 3599.40 of the Revised Code do not 941

H. B. No. 250 Page 33
As Introduced
apply to division (E)(2) of this section. 942
(3) If a campaign committee shows that it has exercised 943
its best efforts to obtain, maintain, and submit the information 944
required under divisions (B)(4)(b)(ii) and (iii) of this 945
section, that committee is considered to have met the 946
requirements of those divisions. A campaign committee shall not 947
be considered to have exercised its best efforts unless, in 948
connection with written solicitations, it regularly includes a 949
written request for the information required under division (B) 950
(4)(b)(ii) of this section from the contributor or the 951
information required under division (B)(4)(b)(iii) of this 952
section from whoever transmits the contribution. 953
(4) Any check that a political action committee uses to 954
make a contribution or an expenditure shall contain the full 955
name and address of the committee and the registration number 956
assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section. 957
(F) As used in this section: 958
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1) of 959
this section, "address" means all of the following if they 960
exist: apartment number, street, road, or highway name and 961
number, rural delivery route number, city or village, state, and 962
zip code as used in a person's post-office address, but not 963
post-office box. 964
(b) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1) of 965
this section, if an address is required in this section, a post- 966
office box and office, room, or suite number may be included in 967
addition to, but not in lieu of, an apartment, street, road, or 968
highway name and number. 969
(c) If an address is required in this section, a campaign 970

H. B. No. 250 Page 34
As Introduced
committee, political action committee, legislative campaign 971
fund, political party, or political contributing entity may use 972
the business or residence address of its treasurer or deputy 973
treasurer. The post-office box number of the campaign committee, 974
political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political 975
party, or political contributing entity may be used in addition 976
to that address. 977
(d) For the sole purpose of a campaign committee's 978
reporting of contributions on a statement of contributions 979
received under division (B)(4) of this section, "address" has 980
one of the following meanings at the option of the campaign 981
committee: 982
(i) The same meaning as in division (F)(1)(a) of this 983
section; 984
(ii) All of the following, if they exist: the 985
contributor's post-office box number and city or village, state, 986
and zip code as used in the contributor's post-office address. 987
(e) As used with regard to the reporting under this 988
section of any expenditure, "address" means all of the following 989
if they exist: apartment number, street, road, or highway name 990
and number, rural delivery route number, city or village, state, 991
and zip code as used in a person's post-office address, or post- 992
office box. If an address concerning any expenditure is required 993
in this section, a campaign committee, political action 994
committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or 995
political contributing entity may use the business or residence 996
address of its treasurer or deputy treasurer or its post-office 997
box number. 998
(2) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for 999

H. B. No. 250 Page 35
As Introduced
the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate 1000
for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, 1001
treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board 1002
of education, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of 1003
the supreme court. 1004
(3) "Candidate for county office" means a candidate for 1005
the office of county auditor, county treasurer, clerk of the 1006
court of common pleas, judge of the court of common pleas, 1007
sheriff, county recorder, county engineer, county commissioner, 1008
prosecuting attorney, or coroner. 1009
(4) "Unincorporated business" includes a cooperative, a 1010
sole proprietorship, a general partnership, a limited 1011
partnership, a limited partnership association, a limited 1012
liability partnership, and a limited liability company. 1013
(G) An independent expenditure shall be reported whenever 1014
and in the same manner that an expenditure is required to be 1015
reported under this section and shall be reported pursuant to 1016
division (B)(2)(a) or (C)(2)(a) of section 3517.105 of the 1017
Revised Code. 1018
(H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2) of 1019
this section, if, during the combined pre-election and 1020
postelection reporting periods for an election, a campaign 1021
committee has received contributions of five hundred dollars or 1022
less and has made expenditures in the total amount of five 1023
hundred dollars or less, it may file a statement to that effect, 1024
under penalty of election falsification, in lieu of the 1025
statement required by division (A)(2) of this section. The 1026
statement shall indicate the total amount of contributions 1027
received and the total amount of expenditures made during those 1028
combined reporting periods. 1029

H. B. No. 250 Page 36
As Introduced
(2) In the case of a successful candidate at a primary 1030
election, if either the total contributions received by or the 1031
total expenditures made by the candidate's campaign committee 1032
during the preprimary, postprimary, pregeneral, and postgeneral 1033
election periods combined equal more than five hundred dollars, 1034
the campaign committee may file the statement under division (H) 1035
(1) of this section only for the primary election. The first 1036
statement that the campaign committee files in regard to the 1037
general election shall reflect all contributions received and 1038
all expenditures made during the preprimary and postprimary 1039
election periods. 1040
(3) Divisions (H)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply 1041
if a campaign committee receives contributions or makes 1042
expenditures prior to the first day of January of the year of 1043
the election at which the candidate seeks nomination or election 1044
to office or if the campaign committee does not file a 1045
termination statement with its postprimary election statement in 1046
the case of an unsuccessful primary election candidate or with 1047
its postgeneral election statement in the case of other 1048
candidates. 1049
(I) In the case of a contribution made by a partner of a 1050
partnership or an owner or a member of another unincorporated 1051
business from any funds of the partnership or other 1052
unincorporated business, all of the following apply: 1053
(1) The recipient of the contribution shall report the 1054
contribution by listing both the partnership or other 1055
unincorporated business and the name of the partner, owner, or 1056
member making the contribution. 1057
(2) In reporting the contribution, the recipient of the 1058
contribution shall be entitled to conclusively rely upon the 1059

H. B. No. 250 Page 37
As Introduced
information provided by the partnership or other unincorporated 1060
business, provided that the information includes one of the 1061
following: 1062
(a) The name of each partner, owner, or member as of the 1063
date of the contribution or contributions, and a statement that 1064
the total contributions are to be allocated equally among all of 1065
the partners, owners, or members; or 1066
(b) The name of each partner, owner, or member as of the 1067
date of the contribution or contributions who is participating 1068
in the contribution or contributions, and a statement that the 1069
contribution or contributions are to be allocated to those 1070
individuals in accordance with the information provided by the 1071
partnership or other unincorporated business to the recipient of 1072
the contribution. 1073
(3) For purposes of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, 1074
the contribution shall be considered to have been made by the 1075
partner, owner, or member reported under division (I)(1) of this 1076
section. 1077
(4) No contribution from a partner of a partnership or an 1078
owner or a member of another unincorporated business shall be 1079
accepted from any funds of the partnership or other 1080
unincorporated business unless the recipient reports the 1081
contribution under division (I)(1) of this section together with 1082
the information provided under division (I)(2) of this section. 1083
(5) No partnership or other unincorporated business shall 1084
make a contribution or contributions solely in the name of the 1085
partnership or other unincorporated business. 1086
(6) As used in division (I) of this section, "partnership 1087
or other unincorporated business" includes, but is not limited 1088

H. B. No. 250 Page 38
As Introduced
to, a cooperative, a sole proprietorship, a general partnership, 1089
a limited partnership, a limited partnership association, a 1090
limited liability partnership, and a limited liability company. 1091
(J) A candidate shall have only one campaign committee at 1092
any given time for all of the offices for which the person is a 1093
candidate or holds office. 1094
(K)(1) In addition to filing a designation of appointment 1095
of a treasurer under division (D)(1) of this section, the 1096
campaign committee of any candidate for an elected municipal 1097
office that pays an annual amount of compensation of five 1098
thousand dollars or less, the campaign committee of any 1099
candidate for member of a board of education except member of 1100
the state board of education, or the campaign committee of any 1101
candidate for township trustee or township fiscal officer may 1102
sign, under penalty of election falsification, a certificate 1103
attesting that the committee will not accept contributions 1104
during an election period that exceed in the aggregate two 1105
thousand dollars from all contributors and one hundred dollars 1106
from any one individual, and that the campaign committee will 1107
not make expenditures during an election period that exceed in 1108
the aggregate two thousand dollars. 1109
The certificate shall be on a form prescribed by the 1110
secretary of state and shall be filed not later than ten days 1111
after the candidate files a declaration of candidacy and 1112
petition, a nominating petition, or a declaration of intent to 1113
be a write-in candidate. 1114
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(3) of 1115
this section, a campaign committee that files a certificate 1116
under division (K)(1) of this section is not required to file 1117
the statements required by division (A) of this section. 1118

H. B. No. 250 Page 39
As Introduced
(3) If, after filing a certificate under division (K)(1) 1119
of this section, a campaign committee exceeds any of the 1120
limitations described in that division during an election 1121
period, the certificate is void and thereafter the campaign 1122
committee shall file the statements required by division (A) of 1123
this section. If the campaign committee has not previously filed 1124
a statement, then on the first statement the campaign committee 1125
is required to file under division (A) of this section after the 1126
committee's certificate is void, the committee shall report all 1127
contributions received and expenditures made from the time the 1128
candidate filed the candidate's declaration of candidacy and 1129
petition, nominating petition, or declaration of intent to be a 1130
write-in candidate. 1131
(4) As used in division (K) of this section, "election 1132
period" means the period of time beginning on the day a person 1133
files a declaration of candidacy and petition, nominating 1134
petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate 1135
through the day of the election at which the person seeks 1136
nomination to office if the person is not elected to office, or, 1137
if the candidate was nominated in a primary election, the day of 1138
the election at which the candidate seeks office. 1139
(L) A political contributing entity that receives 1140
contributions from the dues, membership fees, or other 1141
assessments of its members or from its officers, shareholders, 1142
and employees may report the aggregate amount of contributions 1143
received from those contributors and the number of individuals 1144
making those contributions, for each filing period under 1145
divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, rather than 1146
reporting information as required under division (B)(4) of this 1147
section, including, when applicable, the name of the current 1148
employer, if any, of a contributor whose contribution exceeds 1149

H. B. No. 250 Page 40
As Introduced
one hundred dollars or, if such a contributor is self-employed, 1150
the contributor's occupation and the name of the contributor's 1151
business, if any. Division (B)(4) of this section applies to a 1152
political contributing entity with regard to contributions it 1153
receives from all other contributors. 1154
Sec. 3517.102. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 1155
3517.103 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and 1156
sections 3517.103 and 3517.104 of the Revised Code: 1157
(1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 1158
of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices 1159
of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of 1160
state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state 1161
board of education, member of the general assembly, chief 1162
justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. 1163
(2) "Statewide candidate" or "any one statewide candidate" 1164
means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and 1165
lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary 1166
of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney 1167
general, member of the state board of education, chief justice 1168
of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. 1169
(3) "Senate candidate" means a candidate for the office of 1170
state senator. 1171
(4) "House candidate" means a candidate for the office of 1172
state representative. 1173
(5)(a) "Primary election period" for a candidate begins on 1174
the beginning date of the candidate's pre-filing period 1175
specified in division (A)(9) of section 3517.109 of the Revised 1176
Code and ends on the day of the primary election. 1177
(b) In regard to any candidate, the "general election 1178

H. B. No. 250 Page 41
As Introduced
period" begins on the day after the primary election immediately 1179
preceding the general election at which the candidate seeks an 1180
office specified in division (A)(1) of this section and ends on 1181
the thirty-first day of December following that general 1182
election. 1183
(6) "State candidate fund" means the state candidate fund 1184
established by a state or county political party under division 1185
(D)(3)(c) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 1186
(7) "Postgeneral election statement" means the statement 1187
filed under division (A)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised 1188
Code by the campaign committee of a candidate after the general 1189
election in which the candidate ran for office or filed by 1190
legislative campaign fund after the general election in an even- 1191
numbered year. 1192
(8) "Contribution" means any contribution that is required 1193
to be reported in the statement of contributions under section 1194
3517.10 of the Revised Code. 1195
(9)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(9)(b) 1196
of this section, "designated state campaign committee" means: 1197
(i) In the case of contributions to or from a state 1198
political party, a campaign committee of a statewide candidate, 1199
statewide officeholder, senate candidate, house candidate, or 1200
member of the general assembly. 1201
(ii) In the case of contributions to or from a county 1202
political party, a campaign committee of a senate candidate or 1203
house candidate whose candidacy is to be submitted to some or 1204
all of the electors in that county, or member of the general 1205
assembly whose district contains all or part of that county. 1206
(iii) In the case of contributions to or from a 1207

H. B. No. 250 Page 42
As Introduced
legislative campaign fund, a campaign committee of any of the 1208
following: 1209
(I) A senate or house candidate who, if elected, will be a 1210
member of the same party that established the legislative 1211
campaign fund and the same house with which the legislative 1212
campaign fund is associated; 1213
(II) A state senator or state representative who is a 1214
member of the same party that established the legislative 1215
campaign fund and the same house with which the legislative 1216
campaign fund is associated. 1217
(b) A campaign committee is no longer a "designated state 1218
campaign committee" after the campaign committee's candidate 1219
changes the designation of treasurer required to be filed under 1220
division (D)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code to 1221
indicate that the person intends to be a candidate for, or 1222
becomes a candidate for nomination or election to, any office 1223
that, if elected, would not qualify that candidate's campaign 1224
committee as a "designated state campaign committee" under 1225
division (A)(9)(a) of this section. 1226
(B)(1)(a) No individual who is seven years of age or older 1227
shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more 1228
than: 1229
(i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1230
one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a 1231
general election period; 1232
(ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1233
one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a 1234
general election period; 1235
(iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of 1236

H. B. No. 250 Page 43
As Introduced
any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a 1237
general election period; 1238
(iv) Ten thousand dollars to a county political party of 1239
the county in which the individual's designated Ohio residence 1240
is located for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar 1241
year; 1242
(v) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative 1243
campaign fund in a calendar year; 1244
(vi) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political 1245
party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; 1246
(vii) Ten thousand dollars to any one political action 1247
committee in a calendar year; 1248
(viii) Ten thousand dollars to any one political 1249
contributing entity in a calendar year. 1250
(b) No individual shall make a contribution or 1251
contributions to the state candidate fund of a county political 1252
party of any county other than the county in which the 1253
individual's designated Ohio residence is located. 1254
(c) No individual who is under seven years of age shall 1255
make any contribution. 1256
(2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no 1257
political action committee shall make a contribution or 1258
contributions aggregating more than: 1259
(i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1260
one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a 1261
general election period; 1262
(ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1263

H. B. No. 250 Page 44
As Introduced
one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a 1264
general election period; 1265
(iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of 1266
any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a 1267
general election period; 1268
(iv) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative 1269
campaign fund in a calendar year; 1270
(v) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political 1271
party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; 1272
(vi) Ten thousand dollars to another political action 1273
committee or to a political contributing entity in a calendar 1274
year. This division does not apply to a political action 1275
committee that makes a contribution to a political action 1276
committee or a political contributing entity affiliated with it. 1277
For purposes of this division, a political action committee is 1278
affiliated with another political action committee or with a 1279
political contributing entity if they are both established, 1280
financed, maintained, or controlled by, or if they are, the same 1281
corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing 1282
association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, 1283
division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor 1284
organization, continuing association, or other person. 1285
(b) No political action committee shall make a 1286
contribution or contributions to a county political party for 1287
the party's state candidate fund. 1288
(3) No campaign committee shall make a contribution or 1289
contributions aggregating more than: 1290
(a) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1291
one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a 1292

H. B. No. 250 Page 45
As Introduced
general election period; 1293
(b) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1294
one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a 1295
general election period; 1296
(c) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1297
one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general 1298
election period; 1299
(d) Ten thousand dollars to any one political action 1300
committee in a calendar year; 1301
(e) Ten thousand dollars to any one political contributing 1302
entity in a calendar year. 1303
(4)(a) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, no 1304
political party shall make a contribution or contributions 1305
aggregating more than ten thousand dollars to any one political 1306
action committee or to any one political contributing entity in 1307
a calendar year. 1308
(b) No county political party shall make a contribution or 1309
contributions to another county political party. 1310
(5)(a) Subject to division (B)(5)(b) of this section, no 1311
campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign 1312
committee, shall make a contribution or contributions 1313
aggregating in a calendar year more than: 1314
(i) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political 1315
party for the party's state candidate fund; 1316
(ii) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative 1317
campaign fund; 1318
(iii) Ten thousand dollars to any one county political 1319

H. B. No. 250 Page 46
As Introduced
party for the party's state candidate fund. 1320
(b) No campaign committee shall make a contribution or 1321
contributions to a county political party for the party's state 1322
candidate fund unless one of the following applies: 1323
(i) The campaign committee's candidate will appear on a 1324
ballot in that county. 1325
(ii) The campaign committee's candidate is the holder of 1326
an elected public office that represents all or part of the 1327
population of that county at the time the contribution is made. 1328
(6)(a) No state candidate fund of a county political party 1329
shall make a contribution or contributions, except a 1330
contribution or contributions to a designated state campaign 1331
committee, in a primary election period or a general election 1332
period, aggregating more than: 1333
(i) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the campaign 1334
committee of any one statewide candidate; 1335
(ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1336
one senate candidate; 1337
(iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of 1338
any one house candidate. 1339
(b)(i) No state candidate fund of a state or county 1340
political party shall make a transfer or a contribution or 1341
transfers or contributions of cash or cash equivalents to a 1342
designated state campaign committee in a primary election period 1343
or in a general election period aggregating more than: 1344
(I) Five hundred thousand dollars to the campaign 1345
committee of any one statewide candidate; 1346

H. B. No. 250 Page 47
As Introduced
(II) One hundred thousand dollars to the campaign 1347
committee of any one senate candidate; 1348
(III) Fifty thousand dollars to the campaign committee of 1349
any one house candidate. 1350
(ii) No legislative campaign fund shall make a transfer or 1351
a contribution or transfers or contributions of cash or cash 1352
equivalents to a designated state campaign committee aggregating 1353
more than: 1354
(I) Fifty thousand dollars in a primary election period or 1355
one hundred thousand dollars in a general election period to the 1356
campaign committee of any one senate candidate; 1357
(II) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a primary election 1358
period or fifty thousand dollars in a general election period to 1359
the campaign committee of any one house candidate. 1360
(iii) As used in divisions (B)(6)(b) and (C)(6) of this 1361
section, "transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents" 1362
does not include any in-kind contributions. 1363
(c) A county political party that has no state candidate 1364
fund and that is located in a county having a population of less 1365
than one hundred fifty thousand may make one or more 1366
contributions from other accounts to any one statewide candidate 1367
or to any one designated state campaign committee that do not 1368
exceed, in the aggregate, two thousand five hundred dollars in 1369
any primary election period or general election period. 1370
(d) No legislative campaign fund shall make a 1371
contribution, other than to a designated state campaign 1372
committee or to the state candidate fund of a political party. 1373
(7)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no 1374

H. B. No. 250 Page 48
As Introduced
political contributing entity shall make a contribution or 1375
contributions aggregating more than: 1376
(i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1377
one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a 1378
general election period; 1379
(ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any 1380
one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a 1381
general election period; 1382
(iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of 1383
any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a 1384
general election period; 1385
(iv) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative 1386
campaign fund in a calendar year; 1387
(v) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political 1388
party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; 1389
(vi) Ten thousand dollars to another political 1390
contributing entity or to a political action committee in a 1391
calendar year. This division does not apply to a political 1392
contributing entity that makes a contribution to a political 1393
contributing entity or a political action committee affiliated 1394
with it. For purposes of this division, a political contributing 1395
entity is affiliated with another political contributing entity 1396
or with a political action committee if they are both 1397
established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or if they 1398
are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, 1399
continuing association, or other person, including any parent, 1400
subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, 1401
organization, labor organization, continuing association, or 1402
other person. 1403

H. B. No. 250 Page 49
As Introduced
(b) No political contributing entity shall make a 1404
contribution or contributions to a county political party for 1405
the party's state candidate fund. 1406
(C)(1)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no 1407
campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall do any of the 1408
following: 1409
(i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from 1410
any individual who is under seven years of age; 1411
(ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating 1412
more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is 1413
seven years of age or older, from any one political action 1414
committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from 1415
any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or 1416
in a general election period; 1417
(iii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating 1418
more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars from any one or 1419
combination of state candidate funds of county political parties 1420
in a primary election period or in a general election period. 1421
(b) No campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall 1422
accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two 1423
thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in 1424
a general election period from a county political party that has 1425
no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a 1426
population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. 1427
(2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section and 1428
except for a designated state campaign committee, no campaign 1429
committee of a senate candidate shall do either of the 1430
following: 1431
(i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from 1432

H. B. No. 250 Page 50
As Introduced
any individual who is under seven years of age; 1433
(ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating 1434
more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is 1435
seven years of age or older, from any one political action 1436
committee, from any one political contributing entity, from any 1437
one state candidate fund of a county political party, or from 1438
any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or 1439
in a general election period. 1440
(b) No campaign committee of a senate candidate shall 1441
accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two 1442
thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in 1443
a general election period from a county political party that has 1444
no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a 1445
population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. 1446
(3)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section and 1447
except for a designated state campaign committee, no campaign 1448
committee of a house candidate shall do either of the following: 1449
(i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from 1450
any individual who is under seven years of age; 1451
(ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating 1452
more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is 1453
seven years of age or older, from any one political action 1454
committee, from any one political contributing entity, from any 1455
one state candidate fund of a county political party, or from 1456
any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or 1457
in a general election period. 1458
(b) No campaign committee of a house candidate shall 1459
accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two 1460
thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in 1461

H. B. No. 250 Page 51
As Introduced
a general election period from a county political party that has 1462
no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a 1463
population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. 1464
(4)(a)(i) Subject to division (C)(4)(a)(ii) of this 1465
section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no 1466
county political party shall knowingly accept a contribution or 1467
contributions from any individual who is under seven years of 1468
age, or accept a contribution or contributions for the party's 1469
state candidate fund aggregating more than ten thousand dollars 1470
from any one individual whose designated Ohio residence is 1471
located within that county and who is seven years of age or 1472
older or from any one campaign committee in a calendar year. 1473
(ii) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no county 1474
political party shall accept a contribution or contributions for 1475
the party's state candidate fund from any individual whose 1476
designated Ohio residence is located outside of that county and 1477
who is seven years of age or older, from any campaign committee 1478
unless the campaign committee's candidate will appear on a 1479
ballot in that county or unless the campaign committee's 1480
candidate is the holder of an elected public office that 1481
represents all or part of the population of that county at the 1482
time the contribution is accepted, or from any political action 1483
committee or any political contributing entity. 1484
(iii) No county political party shall accept a 1485
contribution or contributions from any other county political 1486
party. 1487
(b) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no state 1488
political party shall do either of the following: 1489
(i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from 1490

H. B. No. 250 Page 52
As Introduced
any individual who is under seven years of age; 1491
(ii) Accept a contribution or contributions for the 1492
party's state candidate fund aggregating more than thirty 1493
thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of 1494
age or older, from any one political action committee, from any 1495
one political contributing entity, or from any one campaign 1496
committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, in 1497
a calendar year. 1498
(5) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no 1499
legislative campaign fund shall do either of the following: 1500
(a) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from 1501
any individual who is under seven years of age; 1502
(b) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating 1503
more than fifteen thousand dollars from any one individual who 1504
is seven years of age or older, from any one political action 1505
committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from 1506
any one campaign committee, other than a designated state 1507
campaign committee, in a calendar year. 1508
(6)(a) No designated state campaign committee shall accept 1509
a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from a 1510
state candidate fund of a state political party aggregating in a 1511
primary election period or a general election period more than: 1512
(i) Five hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a 1513
campaign committee of a statewide candidate; 1514
(ii) One hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a 1515
campaign committee of a senate candidate; 1516
(iii) Fifty thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign 1517
committee of a house candidate. 1518

H. B. No. 250 Page 53
As Introduced
(b) No designated state campaign committee shall accept a 1519
transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from a 1520
legislative campaign fund aggregating more than: 1521
(i) Fifty thousand dollars in a primary election period or 1522
one hundred thousand dollars in a general election period, in 1523
the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; 1524
(ii) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a primary election 1525
period or fifty thousand dollars in a general election period, 1526
in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. 1527
(c) No campaign committee of a candidate for the office of 1528
member of the general assembly, including a designated state 1529
campaign committee, shall accept a transfer or contribution of 1530
cash or cash equivalents from any one or combination of state 1531
candidate funds of county political parties aggregating in a 1532
primary election period or a general election period more than: 1533
(i) One hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a 1534
campaign committee of a senate candidate; 1535
(ii) Fifty thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign 1536
committee of a house candidate. 1537
(7)(a) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, no 1538
political action committee and no political contributing entity 1539
shall do either of the following: 1540
(i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from 1541
any individual who is under seven years of age; 1542
(ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating 1543
more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is 1544
seven years of age or older, from any one campaign committee, or 1545
from any one political party in a calendar year. 1546

H. B. No. 250 Page 54
As Introduced
(b) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no 1547
political action committee shall accept a contribution or 1548
contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from 1549
another political action committee or from a political 1550
contributing entity in a calendar year. Subject to division (D) 1551
(1) of this section, no political contributing entity shall 1552
accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten 1553
thousand dollars from another political contributing entity or 1554
from a political action committee in a calendar year. This 1555
division does not apply to a political action committee or 1556
political contributing entity that accepts a contribution from a 1557
political action committee or political contributing entity 1558
affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political 1559
action committee is affiliated with another political action 1560
committee or with a political contributing entity if they are 1561
both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by the 1562
same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing 1563
association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, 1564
division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor 1565
organization, continuing association, or other person. 1566
(D)(1)(a) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in 1567
division (B)(2) of this section and the limitations prescribed 1568
in divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7)(b) of this 1569
section, whichever is applicable, all contributions made by and 1570
all contributions accepted from political action committees that 1571
are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or that 1572
are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, 1573
continuing association, or other person, including any parent, 1574
subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, 1575
organization, labor organization, continuing association, or 1576
other person, are considered to have been made by or accepted 1577

H. B. No. 250 Page 55
As Introduced
from a single political action committee. 1578
(b) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in division 1579
(B)(7) of this section and the limitations prescribed in 1580
divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7)(b) of this 1581
section, whichever is applicable, all contributions made by and 1582
all contributions accepted from political contributing entities 1583
that are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or 1584
that are, the same corporation, organization, labor 1585
organization, continuing association, or other person, including 1586
any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that 1587
corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing 1588
association, or other person, are considered to have been made 1589
by or accepted from a single political contributing entity. 1590
(2) As used in divisions (B)(1)(a)(vii), (B)(3)(d), (B)(4) 1591
(a), and (C)(7) of this section, "political action committee" 1592
does not include a political action committee that is organized 1593
to support or oppose a ballot issue or question and that makes 1594
no contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a political 1595
party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political 1596
action committee, or political contributing entity. As used in 1597
divisions (B)(1)(a)(viii), (B)(3)(e), (B)(4)(a), and (C)(7) of 1598
this section, "political contributing entity" does not include a 1599
political contributing entity that is organized to support or 1600
oppose a ballot issue or question and that makes no 1601
contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a political party, 1602
campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action 1603
committee, or political contributing entity. 1604
(3) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in 1605
divisions (B)(4) and (C)(7)(a) of this section, all 1606
contributions made by and all contributions accepted from a 1607

H. B. No. 250 Page 56
As Introduced
national political party, a state political party, and a county 1608
political party are considered to have been made by or accepted 1609
from a single political party and shall be combined with each 1610
other to determine whether the limitations have been exceeded. 1611
(E)(1) If a legislative campaign fund has kept a total 1612
amount of contributions exceeding one hundred fifty thousand 1613
dollars at the close of business on the seventh day before the 1614
postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under 1615
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, the legislative campaign 1616
fund shall comply with division (E)(2) of this section. 1617
(2)(a) Any legislative campaign fund that has kept a total 1618
amount of contributions in excess of the amount specified in 1619
division (E)(1) of this section at the close of business on the 1620
seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is 1621
required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code 1622
shall dispose of the excess amount in the manner prescribed in 1623
division (E)(2)(b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section not later 1624
than ninety days after the day the postgeneral election 1625
statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the 1626
Revised Code. Any legislative campaign fund that is required to 1627
dispose of an excess amount of contributions under this division 1628
shall file a statement on the ninetieth day after the 1629
postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under 1630
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code indicating the total amount 1631
of contributions the fund has at the close of business on the 1632
seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is 1633
required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code 1634
and that the excess contributions were disposed of pursuant to 1635
this division and division (E)(2)(b) of this section. The 1636
statement shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of 1637
state and shall contain any additional information the secretary 1638

H. B. No. 250 Page 57
As Introduced
of state considers necessary. 1639
(b) Any legislative campaign fund that is required to 1640
dispose of an excess amount of contributions under division (E) 1641
(2) of this section shall dispose of that excess amount by doing 1642
any of the following: 1643
(i) Giving the amount to the treasurer of state for 1644
deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio 1645
elections commission fund created by division (I) of section 1646
3517.152 of the Revised Code; 1647
(ii) Giving the amount to individuals who made 1648
contributions to that legislative campaign fund as a refund of 1649
all or part of their contributions; 1650
(iii) Giving the amount to a corporation that is exempt 1651
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and 1652
described in subsection 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. 1653
(F)(1) No legislative campaign fund shall fail to file a 1654
statement required by division (E) of this section. 1655
(2) No legislative campaign fund shall fail to dispose of 1656
excess contributions as required by division (E) of this 1657
section. 1658
(G) Nothing in this section shall affect, be used in 1659
determining, or supersede a limitation on campaign contributions 1660
as provided for in the Federal Election Campaign Act. 1661
Sec. 3517.105. (A)(1) As used in this section, "public 1662
political advertising" means advertising to the general public 1663
through a broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, poster, 1664
yard sign, or outdoor advertising facility, by direct mail, or 1665
by any other means of advertising to the general public. 1666

H. B. No. 250 Page 58
As Introduced
(2) For purposes of this section and section 3517.20 of 1667
the Revised Code, a person is a member of a political action 1668
committee if the person makes one or more contributions to that 1669
political action committee, and a person is a member of a 1670
political contributing entity if the person makes one or more 1671
contributions to, or pays dues, membership fees, or other 1672
assessments to, that political contributing entity. 1673
(B)(1) Whenever a candidate, a campaign committee, a 1674
political action committee or political contributing entity with 1675
ten or more members, or a legislative campaign fund makes an 1676
independent expenditure, or whenever a political action 1677
committee or political contributing entity with fewer than ten 1678
members makes an independent expenditure in excess of one 1679
hundred dollars for a local candidate, in excess of two hundred 1680
fifty dollars for a candidate for the office of member of the 1681
general assembly, or in excess of five hundred dollars for a 1682
statewide candidate, for the purpose of financing communications 1683
advocating the election or defeat of an identified candidate or 1684
solicits without the candidate's express consent a contribution 1685
for or against an identified candidate through public political 1686
advertising, a statement shall appear or be presented in a clear 1687
and conspicuous manner in the advertising that does both of the 1688
following: 1689
(a) Clearly indicates that the communication or public 1690
political advertising is not authorized by the candidate or the 1691
candidate's campaign committee; 1692
(b) Clearly identifies the candidate, campaign committee, 1693
political action committee, political contributing entity, or 1694
legislative campaign fund that has paid for the communication or 1695
public political advertising in accordance with section 3517.20 1696

H. B. No. 250 Page 59
As Introduced
of the Revised Code. 1697
(2)(a) Whenever any campaign committee, legislative 1698
campaign fund, political action committee, political 1699
contributing entity, or political party makes an independent 1700
expenditure in support of or opposition to any candidate, the 1701
committee, entity, fund, or party shall report the independent 1702
expenditure and identify the candidate on a statement prescribed 1703
by the secretary of state and filed by the committee, entity, 1704
fund, or party as part of its statement of contributions and 1705
expenditures pursuant to division (A) of section 3517.10 and 1706
division (A) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. 1707
(b) Whenever any individual, partnership, or other entity, 1708
except a corporation, labor organization, campaign committee, 1709
legislative campaign fund, political action committee, political 1710
contributing entity, or political party, makes one or more 1711
independent expenditures in support of or opposition to any 1712
candidate, the individual, partnership, or other entity shall 1713
file with the secretary of state in the case of a statewide 1714
candidate, or with the board of elections in the county in which 1715
the candidate files the candidate's petitions for nomination or 1716
election for district or local office, not later than the dates 1717
specified in divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of section 1718
3517.10 of the Revised Code, and, except as otherwise provided 1719
in that section, a statement itemizing all independent 1720
expenditures made during the period since the close of business 1721
on the last day reflected in the last previously filed such 1722
statement, if any. The statement shall be made on a form 1723
prescribed by the secretary of state or shall be filed by 1724
electronic means of transmission pursuant to division (E) of 1725
section 3517.106 of the Revised Code as authorized or required 1726
by that division. The statement shall indicate the date and the 1727

H. B. No. 250 Page 60
As Introduced
amount of each independent expenditure and the candidate on 1728
whose behalf it was made and shall be made under penalty of 1729
election falsification. 1730
(C)(1) Whenever a corporation, labor organization, 1731
campaign committee, political action committee or political 1732
contributing entity with ten or more members, or legislative 1733
campaign fund makes an independent expenditure, or whenever a 1734
political action committee or political contributing entity with 1735
fewer than ten members makes an independent expenditure in 1736
excess of one hundred dollars for a local ballot issue or 1737
question, or in excess of five hundred dollars for a statewide 1738
ballot issue or question, for the purpose of financing 1739
communications advocating support of or opposition to an 1740
identified ballot issue or question or solicits without the 1741
express consent of the ballot issue committee a contribution for 1742
or against an identified ballot issue or question through public 1743
political advertising, a statement shall appear or be presented 1744
in a clear and conspicuous manner in the advertising that does 1745
both of the following: 1746
(a) Clearly indicates that the communication or public 1747
political advertising is not authorized by the identified ballot 1748
issue committee; 1749
(b) Clearly identifies the corporation, labor 1750
organization, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, or 1751
political action committee, or political contributing entity 1752
that has paid for the communication or public political 1753
advertising in accordance with section 3517.20 of the Revised 1754
Code. 1755
(2)(a) Whenever any corporation, labor organization, 1756
campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, 1757

H. B. No. 250 Page 61
As Introduced
or political action committee, or political contributing entity 1758
makes an independent expenditure in support of or opposition to 1759
any ballot issue or question, the corporation or labor 1760
organization shall report the independent expenditure in 1761
accordance with division (C) of section 3599.03 of the Revised 1762
Code, and the campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, 1763
political party, or political action committee, or political 1764
contributing entity shall report the independent expenditure and 1765
identify the ballot issue or question on a statement prescribed 1766
by the secretary of state and filed by the committee, fund, or 1767
party as part of its statement of contributions and expenditures 1768
pursuant to division (A) of section 3517.10 and division (A) of 1769
section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. 1770
(b) Whenever any individual, partnership, or other entity, 1771
except a corporation, labor organization, campaign committee, 1772
legislative campaign fund, political action committee, political 1773
contributing entity, or political party, makes one or more 1774
independent expenditures in excess of one hundred dollars in 1775
support of or opposition to any ballot issue or question, the 1776
individual, partnership, or other entity shall file with the 1777
secretary of state in the case of a statewide ballot issue or 1778
question, or with the board of elections in the county that 1779
certifies the issue or question for placement on the ballot in 1780
the case of a district or local issue or question, not later 1781
than the dates specified in divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), and (4) 1782
of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, and, except as otherwise 1783
provided in that section, a statement itemizing all independent 1784
expenditures made during the period since the close of business 1785
on the last day reflected in the last previously filed such 1786
statement, if any. The statement shall be made on a form 1787
prescribed by the secretary of state or shall be filed by 1788

H. B. No. 250 Page 62
As Introduced
electronic means of transmission pursuant to division (E) of 1789
section 3517.106 of the Revised Code as authorized or required 1790
by that division. The statement shall indicate the date and the 1791
amount of each independent expenditure and the ballot issue or 1792
question in support of or opposition to which it was made and 1793
shall be made under penalty of election falsification. 1794
(3) No person, campaign committee, legislative campaign 1795
fund, political action committee, corporation, labor 1796
organization, political contributing entity, or other 1797
organization or association shall use or cause to be used a 1798
false or fictitious name in making an independent expenditure in 1799
support of or opposition to any candidate, or an expenditure in 1800
support of or opposition to any ballot issue or question. A name 1801
is false or fictitious if the person, campaign committee, 1802
legislative campaign fund, political action committee, 1803
corporation, labor organization,political contributing entity, 1804
or other organization or association does not actually exist or 1805
operate, if the corporation, labor organization, or other 1806
organization or association has failed to file a fictitious name 1807
or other registration with the secretary of state, if it is 1808
required to do so, or if the person, campaign committee, 1809
legislative campaign fund, or political action committee, or 1810
political contributing entity has failed to file a designation 1811
of the appointment of a treasurer, if it is required to do so by 1812
division (D)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 1813
(D) Any expenditure by a political party for the purpose 1814
of financing communications advocating the election or defeat of 1815
a candidate for judicial office shall be deemed to be an 1816
independent expenditure subject to the provisions of this 1817
section. 1818

H. B. No. 250 Page 63
As Introduced
Sec. 3517.106. (A) As used in this section: 1819
(1) "Statewide office" means any of the offices of 1820
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of 1821
state, treasurer of state, attorney general, chief justice of 1822
the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. 1823
(2) "Addendum to a statement" includes an amendment or 1824
other correction to that statement. 1825
(B) The secretary of state shall store all of the 1826
following information on computer: 1827
(1) The information contained in statements of 1828
contributions and expenditures and monthly statements required 1829
to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code and in 1830
statements of independent expenditures required to be filed 1831
under section 3517.105 of the Revised Code with the secretary of 1832
state and the information transmitted to the secretary of state 1833
by boards of elections under division (E)(2) of this section; 1834
(2) The information contained in disclosure of 1835
electioneering communications statements required to be filed 1836
under section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code; 1837
(3) The information contained in deposit and disbursement 1838
statements required to be filed with the office of the secretary 1839
of state under section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code; 1840
(4) The gift and disbursement information contained in 1841
statements required to be filed with the office of the secretary 1842
of state under section 3517.1013 of the Revised Code; 1843
(5) The information contained in donation and disbursement 1844
statements required to be filed with the office of the secretary 1845
of state under section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. 1846

H. B. No. 250 Page 64
As Introduced
(C)(1) The secretary of state shall make available to the 1847
campaign committees, political action committees, political 1848
contributing entities, legislative campaign funds, political 1849
parties, individuals, partnerships, corporations, labor 1850
organizations, treasurers of transition funds, and other 1851
entities that are permitted or required to file statements by 1852
electronic means of transmission, and to members of the news 1853
media and other interested persons, for a reasonable fee, 1854
computer programs that are compatible with the secretary of 1855
state's method of storing the information contained in the 1856
statements. 1857
(2) The secretary of state shall make the information 1858
required to be stored under division (B) of this section 1859
available on computer at the secretary of state's office so 1860
that, to the maximum extent feasible, individuals may obtain at 1861
the secretary of state's office any part or all of that 1862
information for any given year, subject to the limitation 1863
expressed in division (D) of this section. 1864
(D) The secretary of state shall keep the information 1865
stored on computer under division (B) of this section for at 1866
least six years. 1867
(E)(1) Subject to division (J) of this section and subject 1868
to the secretary of state having implemented, tested, and 1869
verified the successful operation of any system the secretary of 1870
state prescribes pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section and 1871
divisions (C)(6)(b) and (D)(6) of section 3517.10 of the Revised 1872
Code for the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic 1873
means of transmission, each of the following entities shall be 1874
permitted or required to file statements by electronic means of 1875
transmission, as applicable: 1876

H. B. No. 250 Page 65
As Introduced
(a) The campaign committee of each candidate for statewide 1877
office may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of 1878
the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission or, if the 1879
total amount of the contributions received or the total amount 1880
of the expenditures made by the campaign committee for the 1881
applicable reporting period as specified in division (A) of 1882
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code exceeds ten thousand 1883
dollars, shall file those statements by electronic means of 1884
transmission. 1885
(b) A campaign committee of a candidate for the office of 1886
member of the general assembly or a campaign committee of a 1887
candidate for the office of judge of a court of appeals may file 1888
the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code 1889
in accordance with division (A)(2) of section 3517.11 of the 1890
Revised Code or by electronic means of transmission to the 1891
office of the secretary of state or, if the total amount of the 1892
contributions received by the campaign committee for the 1893
applicable reporting period as specified in division (A) of 1894
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code exceeds ten thousand 1895
dollars, shall file those statements by electronic means of 1896
transmission to the office of the secretary of state. 1897
(c) A campaign committee of a candidate for an office 1898
other than a statewide office, the office of member of the 1899
general assembly, or the office of judge of a court of appeals 1900
may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the 1901
Revised Code by electronic means of transmission to the 1902
secretary of state or the board of elections, as applicable. 1903
(d) A political action committee and a political 1904
contributing entity described in division (A)(1) of section 1905
3517.11 of the Revised Code, a legislative campaign fund, and a 1906

H. B. No. 250 Page 66
As Introduced
state political party may file the statements prescribed by 1907
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of 1908
transmission to the office of the secretary of state or, if the 1909
total amount of the contributions received or the total amount 1910
of the expenditures made by the political action committee, 1911
political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or 1912
state political party for the applicable reporting period as 1913
specified in division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code 1914
exceeds ten thousand dollars, shall file those statements by 1915
electronic means of transmission. 1916
(e) A county political party shall file the statements 1917
prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with respect 1918
to its state candidate fund by electronic means of transmission 1919
to the office of the secretary of state. 1920
(f) A county political party may file all other statements 1921
prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic 1922
means of transmission to the board of elections. 1923
(g) A political action committee or political contributing 1924
entity described in division (A)(3) of section 3517.11 of the 1925
Revised Code may file the statements prescribed by section 1926
3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission 1927
to the board of elections. 1928
(h) Any individual, partnership, or other entity that 1929
makes independent expenditures in support of or opposition to a 1930
statewide candidate or expenditures in support of or opposition 1931
to a statewide ballot issue or question as provided in division 1932
(B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code 1933
may file the statement specified in that division by electronic 1934
means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state 1935
or, if the total amount of independent expenditures made during 1936

H. B. No. 250 Page 67
As Introduced
the reporting period under that division exceeds ten thousand 1937
dollars, shall file the statement specified in that division by 1938
electronic means of transmission. 1939
(i) Any individual, partnership, or other entity that 1940
makes independent expenditures in support of or opposition to a 1941
candidate or expenditures in support of or opposition to a 1942
ballot issue other than a statewide candidate or a statewide 1943
ballot issue as provided in division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of 1944
section 3517.105 of the Revised Code may file the statement 1945
specified in that division by electronic means of transmission 1946
to the board of elections. 1947
(2) A board of elections that receives a statement by 1948
electronic means of transmission shall transmit that statement 1949
to the secretary of state within five business days after 1950
receiving the statement. If the board receives an addendum or an 1951
amended statement from an entity that filed a statement with the 1952
board by electronic means of transmission, the board shall 1953
transmit the addendum or amended statement to the secretary of 1954
state not later than the close of business on the day the board 1955
received the addendum or amended statement. 1956
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(3)(b) 1957
of this section, within five business days after a statement 1958
filed under division (E)(1) of this section is received by the 1959
secretary of state by electronic or other means of transmission, 1960
the secretary of state shall make available online to the public 1961
through the internet, as provided in division (G) of this 1962
section, the contribution and expenditure information in that 1963
statement. 1964
(b) The secretary of state shall not make available online 1965
to the public through the internet any contribution or 1966

H. B. No. 250 Page 68
As Introduced
expenditure information contained in a statement for any 1967
candidate until the secretary of state is able to make available 1968
online to the public through the internet the contribution and 1969
expenditure information for all candidates for a particular 1970
office, or until the applicable filing deadline for that 1971
statement has passed, whichever is sooner. As soon as the 1972
secretary of state has available all of the contribution and 1973
expenditure information for all candidates for a particular 1974
office, or as soon as the applicable filing deadline for a 1975
statement has passed, whichever is sooner, the secretary of 1976
state shall simultaneously make available online to the public 1977
through the internet the information for all candidates for that 1978
office. 1979
(4)(a) If a statement filed by electronic means of 1980
transmission is found to be incomplete or inaccurate after the 1981
examination of the statement for completeness and accuracy 1982
pursuant to division (B)(3)(a) of section 3517.11 of the Revised 1983
Code, the entity that filed the statement shall file by 1984
electronic means of transmission any addendum to the statement 1985
that provides the information necessary to complete or correct 1986
the statement or, if required under that division, an amended 1987
statement. 1988
(b) Within five business days after the secretary of state 1989
receives an addendum to the statement or an amended statement by 1990
electronic or other means of transmission, the secretary of 1991
state shall make the contribution and expenditure information in 1992
the addendum or amended statement available online to the public 1993
through the internet as provided in division (G) of this 1994
section. 1995
(5) If a campaign committee for the office of member of 1996

H. B. No. 250 Page 69
As Introduced
the general assembly or a campaign committee of a candidate for 1997
the office of judge of a court of appeals files a statement, 1998
addendum, or amended statement by printed version only with the 1999
appropriate board of elections, the campaign committee shall 2000
file two copies of the printed version of the statement, 2001
addendum, or amended statement with the board of elections. The 2002
board of elections shall send one of those copies by certified 2003
mail or an electronic copy to the secretary of state before the 2004
close of business on the day the board of elections receives the 2005
statement, addendum, or amended statement. 2006
(F)(1) The secretary of state, by rule adopted pursuant to 2007
section 3517.23 of the Revised Code, shall prescribe one or more 2008
techniques by which a person who executes and transmits to the 2009
secretary of state or a board of elections by electronic means a 2010
statement of contributions and expenditures, a statement of 2011
independent expenditures, a disclosure of electioneering 2012
communications statement, a deposit and disbursement statement, 2013
a gift and disbursement statement, or a donation and 2014
disbursement statement, an addendum to any of those statements, 2015
an amended statement of contributions and expenditures, an 2016
amended statement of independent expenditures, an amended 2017
disclosure of electioneering communications statement, an 2018
amended deposit and disbursement statement, an amended gift and 2019
disbursement statement, or an amended donation and disbursement 2020
statement, under this section or section 3517.10, 3517.105, 2021
3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised 2022
Code shall electronically sign the statement, addendum, or 2023
amended statement. Any technique prescribed by the secretary of 2024
state pursuant to this division shall create an electronic 2025
signature that satisfies all of the following: 2026
(a) It is unique to the signer. 2027

H. B. No. 250 Page 70
As Introduced
(b) It objectively identifies the signer. 2028
(c) It involves the use of a signature device or other 2029
means or method that is under the sole control of the signer and 2030
that cannot be readily duplicated or compromised. 2031
(d) It is created and linked to the electronic record to 2032
which it relates in a manner that, if the record or signature is 2033
intentionally or unintentionally changed after signing, the 2034
electronic signature is invalidated. 2035
(2) An electronic signature prescribed by the secretary of 2036
state under division (F)(1) of this section shall be attached to 2037
or associated with the statement of contributions and 2038
expenditures, the statement of independent expenditures, the 2039
disclosure of electioneering communications statement, the 2040
deposit and disbursement statement, the gift and disbursement 2041
statement, or the donation and disbursement statement, the 2042
addendum to any of those statements, the amended statement of 2043
contributions and expenditures, the amended statement of 2044
independent expenditures, the amended disclosure of 2045
electioneering communications statement, the amended deposit and 2046
disbursement statement, the amended gift and disbursement 2047
statement, or the amended donation and disbursement statement 2048
that is executed and transmitted by electronic means by the 2049
person to whom the electronic signature is attributed. The 2050
electronic signature that is attached to or associated with the 2051
statement, addendum, or amended statement under this division 2052
shall be binding on all persons and for all purposes under the 2053
campaign finance reporting law as if the signature had been 2054
handwritten in ink on a printed form. 2055
(G) The secretary of state shall make all of the following 2056
information available online to the public by any means that are 2057

H. B. No. 250 Page 71
As Introduced
searchable, viewable, and accessible through the internet: 2058
(1) The contribution and expenditure, the contribution and 2059
disbursement, the deposit and disbursement, the gift and 2060
disbursement, or the donation and disbursement information in 2061
all statements, all addenda to the statements, and all amended 2062
statements that are filed with the secretary of state by 2063
electronic or other means of transmission under this section or 2064
section 3517.10, 3517.105, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, 2065
3517.1014, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code; 2066
(2) The contribution and expenditure or the deposit and 2067
disbursement information in all statements that are filed with a 2068
board of elections by electronic means of transmission, and in 2069
all addenda to those statements and all amended versions of 2070
those statements, under this section or section 3517.10, 2071
3517.105, 3517.1012, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code. 2072
(H)(1) As used in this division, "library" means a library 2073
that is open to the public and that is one of the following: 2074
(a) A library that is maintained and regulated under 2075
section 715.13 of the Revised Code; 2076
(b) A library that is created, maintained, and regulated 2077
under Chapter 3375. of the Revised Code. 2078
(2) The secretary of state shall notify all libraries of 2079
the location on the internet at which the contribution and 2080
expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and 2081
disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and 2082
disbursement information in campaign finance statements required 2083
to be made available online to the public through the internet 2084
pursuant to division (G) of this section may be accessed. 2085
If that location is part of the world wide web and if the 2086

H. B. No. 250 Page 72
As Introduced
secretary of state has notified a library of that world wide web 2087
location as required by this division, the library shall include 2088
a link to that world wide web location on each internet- 2089
connected computer it maintains that is accessible to the 2090
public. 2091
(3) If the system the secretary of state prescribes for 2092
the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of 2093
transmission pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section and 2094
divisions (C)(6)(b) and (D)(6) of section 3517.10 of the Revised 2095
Code includes filing those statements through the internet via 2096
the world wide web, the secretary of state shall notify all 2097
libraries of the world wide web location at which those 2098
statements may be filed. 2099
If those statements may be filed through the internet via 2100
the world wide web and if the secretary of state has notified a 2101
library of that world wide web location as required by this 2102
division, the library shall include a link to that world wide 2103
web location on each internet-connected computer it maintains 2104
that is accessible to the public. 2105
(I) It is an affirmative defense to a complaint or charge 2106
brought against any campaign committee, political action 2107
committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign 2108
fund, or political party, any individual, partnership, or other 2109
entity, any person making disbursements to pay the direct costs 2110
of producing or airing electioneering communications, or any 2111
treasurer of a transition fund, for the failure to file by 2112
electronic means of transmission a campaign finance statement as 2113
required by this section or section 3517.10, 3517.105, 2114
3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised 2115
Code that all of the following apply to the campaign committee, 2116

H. B. No. 250 Page 73
As Introduced
political action committee, political contributing entity, 2117
legislative campaign fund, or political party, the individual, 2118
partnership, or other entity, the person making disbursements to 2119
pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering 2120
communications, or the treasurer of a transition fund that 2121
failed to so file: 2122
(1) The campaign committee, political action committee, 2123
political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or 2124
political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, 2125
the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of 2126
producing or airing electioneering communications, or the 2127
treasurer of a transition fund attempted to file by electronic 2128
means of transmission the required statement prior to the 2129
deadline set forth in the applicable section. 2130
(2) The campaign committee, political action committee, 2131
political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or 2132
political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, 2133
the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of 2134
producing or airing electioneering communications, or the 2135
treasurer of a transition fund was unable to file by electronic 2136
means of transmission due to an expected or unexpected shutdown 2137
of the whole or part of the electronic campaign finance 2138
statement-filing system, such as for maintenance or because of 2139
hardware, software, or network connection failure. 2140
(3) The campaign committee, political action committee, 2141
political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or 2142
political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, 2143
the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of 2144
producing or airing electioneering communications, or the 2145
treasurer of a transition fund filed by electronic means of 2146

H. B. No. 250 Page 74
As Introduced
transmission the required statement within a reasonable period 2147
of time after being unable to so file it under the circumstance 2148
described in division (I)(2) of this section. 2149
(J)(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant 2150
to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to permit a campaign 2151
committee of a candidate for statewide office that makes 2152
expenditures of less than twenty-five thousand dollars during 2153
the filing period or a campaign committee for the office of 2154
member of the general assembly or the office of judge of a court 2155
of appeals that would otherwise be required to file campaign 2156
finance statements by electronic means of transmission under 2157
division (E) of this section to file those statements by paper 2158
with the office of the secretary of state. Those rules shall 2159
provide for all of the following: 2160
(a) An eligible campaign committee that wishes to file a 2161
campaign finance statement by paper instead of by electronic 2162
means of transmission shall file the statement on paper with the 2163
office of the secretary of state not sooner than twenty-four 2164
hours after the end of the filing period set forth in section 2165
3517.10 of the Revised Code that is covered by the applicable 2166
statement. 2167
(b) The statement shall be accompanied by a fee, the 2168
amount of which the secretary of state shall determine by rule. 2169
The amount of the fee established under this division shall not 2170
exceed the data entry and data verification costs the secretary 2171
of state will incur to convert the information on the statement 2172
to an electronic format as required under division (G) of this 2173
section. 2174
(c) The secretary of state shall arrange for the 2175
information in campaign finance statements filed pursuant to 2176

H. B. No. 250 Page 75
As Introduced
division (J) of this section to be made available online to the 2177
public through the internet in the same manner, and at the same 2178
times, as information is made available under divisions (E) and 2179
(G) of this section for candidates whose campaign committees 2180
file those statements by electronic means of transmission. 2181
(d) The candidate of an eligible campaign committee that 2182
intends to file a campaign finance statement pursuant to 2183
division (J) of this section shall file a notice indicating that 2184
the candidate's campaign committee intends to so file and 2185
stating that filing the statement by electronic means of 2186
transmission would constitute a hardship for the candidate or 2187
for the eligible campaign committee. 2188
(e) An eligible campaign committee that files a campaign 2189
finance statement on paper pursuant to division (J) of this 2190
section shall review the contribution and information made 2191
available online by the secretary of state with respect to that 2192
paper filing and shall notify the secretary of state of any 2193
errors with respect to that filing that appear in the data made 2194
available on that web site. 2195
(f) If an eligible campaign committee whose candidate has 2196
filed a notice in accordance with rules adopted under division 2197
(J)(1)(d) of this section subsequently fails to file that 2198
statement on paper by the applicable deadline established in 2199
rules adopted under division (J)(1)(a) of this section, 2200
penalties for the late filing of the campaign finance statement 2201
shall apply to that campaign committee for each day after that 2202
paper filing deadline, as if the campaign committee had filed 2203
the statement after the applicable deadline set forth in 2204
division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 2205
(2) The process for permitting campaign committees that 2206

H. B. No. 250 Page 76
As Introduced
would otherwise be required to file campaign finance statements 2207
by electronic means of transmission to file those statements on 2208
paper with the office of the secretary of state that is required 2209
to be developed under division (J)(1) of this section shall be 2210
in effect and available for use by eligible campaign committees 2211
for all campaign finance statements that are required to be 2212
filed on or after June 30, 2005. Notwithstanding any provision 2213
of the Revised Code to the contrary, if the process the 2214
secretary of state is required to develop under division (L)(1) 2215
of this section is not in effect and available for use on and 2216
after June 30, 2005, all penalties for the failure of campaign 2217
committees to file campaign finance statements by electronic 2218
means of transmission shall be suspended until such time as that 2219
process is in effect and available for use. 2220
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to 2221
the contrary, any eligible campaign committee that files 2222
campaign finance statements on paper with the office of the 2223
secretary of state pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section 2224
shall be deemed to have filed those campaign finance statements 2225
by electronic means of transmission to the office of the 2226
secretary of state. 2227
Sec. 3517.107. (A) As used in this section, "federal 2228
political committee" means a political committee, as defined in 2229
the Federal Election Campaign Act, that is registered with the 2230
federal election commission under that act. 2231
(B) Any federal political committee may make 2232
contributions, expenditures, or independent expenditures from 2233
its federal account in connection with any state or local 2234
election in Ohio. Prior to making any such contribution, 2235
expenditure, or independent expenditure, the federal political 2236

H. B. No. 250 Page 77
As Introduced
committee shall register with the secretary of state by filing a 2237
copy of its most recent federal statement of organization. A 2238
federal political committee registered with the secretary of 2239
state under this division shall file with the secretary of state 2240
any amendment to its statement of organization that is required 2241
under the Federal Election Campaign Act to be reported to the 2242
federal election commission. 2243
(C) When, during any federal reporting period under the 2244
Federal Election Campaign Act, a federal political committee 2245
makes a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure 2246
from its federal account in connection with a state or local 2247
election in Ohio, the committee shall file with the secretary of 2248
state not later than the date on which its report is required to 2249
be filed with the appropriate federal office or officer under 2250
the Federal Election Campaign Act, copies of the following pages 2251
from that report: 2252
(1) The summary page; 2253
(2) The detailed summary page; 2254
(3) The page or pages that contain an itemized list of the 2255
contributions, expenditures, and independent expenditures made 2256
in connection with state and local elections in Ohio. 2257
The total amount of contributions, expenditures, and 2258
independent expenditures made in connection with state and local 2259
elections in Ohio shall be reflected on the summary page or on a 2260
form that the secretary of state shall prescribe. 2261
(D) When, during any calendar year, a federal political 2262
committee makes a contribution from its federal account in 2263
connection with a state or local election in Ohio to a state or 2264
local political action committee that is required under section 2265

H. B. No. 250 Page 78
As Introduced
3517.11 of the Revised Code to file any statement prescribed by 2266
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, and the federal political 2267
committee and state or local political action committee are 2268
established, financed, maintained, or controlled by the same 2269
corporation, organization, continuing association, or other 2270
person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, department, 2271
or unit of that corporation, organization, continuing 2272
association, or other person, the federal political committee 2273
shall file a statement with the secretary of state not later 2274
than the last business day of January of the next calendar year. 2275
The statement shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of 2276
state and shall include a list of the names and addresses of 2277
contributors that are residents of Ohio that made contributions 2278
to the federal political committee during the calendar year 2279
covered by the statement and, for each name listed, the 2280
aggregate total amount contributed by each contributor during 2281
the reporting period. 2282
Sec. 3517.13. (A)(1) No campaign committee of a statewide 2283
candidate shall fail to file a complete and accurate statement 2284
required under division (A)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised 2285
Code. 2286
(2) No campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall 2287
fail to file a complete and accurate monthly statement, and no 2288
campaign committee of a statewide candidate or a candidate for 2289
the office of chief justice or justice of the supreme court 2290
shall fail to file a complete and accurate two-business-day 2291
statement, as required under section 3517.10 of the Revised 2292
Code. 2293
As used in this division, "statewide candidate" has the 2294
same meaning as in division (F)(2) of section 3517.10 of the 2295

H. B. No. 250 Page 79
As Introduced
Revised Code. 2296
(B) No campaign committee shall fail to file a complete 2297
and accurate statement required under division (A)(1) of section 2298
3517.10 of the Revised Code. 2299
(C) No campaign committee shall fail to file a complete 2300
and accurate statement required under division (A)(2) of section 2301
3517.10 of the Revised Code. 2302
(D) No campaign committee shall fail to file a complete 2303
and accurate statement required under division (A)(3) or (4) of 2304
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 2305
(E) No person other than a campaign committee shall 2306
knowingly fail to file a statement required under section 2307
3517.10 or 3517.107 of the Revised Code. 2308
(F) No person shall make cash contributions to any person 2309
totaling more than one hundred dollars in each primary, special, 2310
or general election. 2311
(G)(1) No person shall knowingly conceal or misrepresent 2312
contributions given or received, expenditures made, or any other 2313
information required to be reported by a provision in sections 2314
3517.08 to 3517.13 of the Revised Code. 2315
(2)(a) No person shall make a contribution to a campaign 2316
committee, political action committee, political contributing 2317
entity, legislative campaign fund, political party, or person 2318
making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or 2319
airing electioneering communications in the name of another 2320
person. 2321
(b) A person does not make a contribution in the name of 2322
another when either of the following applies: 2323

H. B. No. 250 Page 80
As Introduced
(i) An individual makes a contribution from a partnership 2324
or other unincorporated business account, if the contribution is 2325
reported by listing both the name of the partnership or other 2326
unincorporated business and the name of the partner or owner 2327
making the contribution as required under division (I) of 2328
section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 2329
(ii) A person makes a contribution in that person's 2330
spouse's name or in both of their names. 2331
(H) No person within this state, publishing a newspaper or 2332
other periodical, shall charge a campaign committee for 2333
political advertising a rate in excess of the rate such person 2334
would charge if the campaign committee were a general rate 2335
advertiser whose advertising was directed to promoting its 2336
business within the same area as that encompassed by the 2337
particular office that the candidate of the campaign committee 2338
is seeking. The rate shall take into account the amount of space 2339
used, as well as the type of advertising copy submitted by or on 2340
behalf of the campaign committee. All discount privileges 2341
otherwise offered by a newspaper or periodical to general rate 2342
advertisers shall be available upon equal terms to all campaign 2343
committees. 2344
No person within this state, operating a radio or 2345
television station or network of stations in this state, shall 2346
charge a campaign committee for political broadcasts a rate that 2347
exceeds: 2348
(1) During the forty-five days preceding the date of a 2349
primary election and during the sixty days preceding the date of 2350
a general or special election in which the candidate of the 2351
campaign committee is seeking office, the lowest unit charge of 2352
the station for the same class and amount of time for the same 2353

H. B. No. 250 Page 81
As Introduced
period; 2354
(2) At any other time, the charges made for comparable use 2355
of that station by its other users. 2356
(I) Subject to divisions (K), (L), (M), and (N) of this 2357
section, no agency or department of this state or any political 2358
subdivision shall award any contract, other than one let by 2359
competitive bidding or a contract incidental to such contract or 2360
which is by force account, for the purchase of goods costing 2361
more than five hundred dollars or services costing more than 2362
five hundred dollars to any individual, partnership, 2363
association, including, without limitation, a professional 2364
association organized under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, 2365
estate, or trust if the individual has made or the individual's 2366
spouse has made, or any partner, shareholder, administrator, 2367
executor, or trustee or the spouse of any of them has made, as 2368
an individual, within the two previous calendar years, one or 2369
more contributions totaling in excess of one thousand dollars to 2370
the holder of the public office having ultimate responsibility 2371
for the award of the contract or to the public officer's 2372
campaign committee. 2373
(J) Subject to divisions (K), (L), (M), and (N) of this 2374
section, no agency or department of this state or any political 2375
subdivision shall award any contract, other than one let by 2376
competitive bidding or a contract incidental to such contract or 2377
which is by force account, for the purchase of goods costing 2378
more than five hundred dollars or services costing more than 2379
five hundred dollars to a corporation or business trust, except 2380
a professional association organized under Chapter 1785. of the 2381
Revised Code, if an owner of more than twenty per cent of the 2382
corporation or business trust or the spouse of that person has 2383

H. B. No. 250 Page 82
As Introduced
made, as an individual, within the two previous calendar years, 2384
taking into consideration only owners for all of that period, 2385
one or more contributions totaling in excess of one thousand 2386
dollars to the holder of a public office having ultimate 2387
responsibility for the award of the contract or to the public 2388
officer's campaign committee. 2389
(K) For purposes of divisions (I) and (J) of this section, 2390
if a public officer who is responsible for the award of a 2391
contract is appointed by the governor, whether or not the 2392
appointment is subject to the advice and consent of the senate, 2393
excluding members of boards, commissions, committees, 2394
authorities, councils, boards of trustees, task forces, and 2395
other such entities appointed by the governor, the office of the 2396
governor is considered to have ultimate responsibility for the 2397
award of the contract. 2398
(L) For purposes of divisions (I) and (J) of this section, 2399
if a public officer who is responsible for the award of a 2400
contract is appointed by the elected chief executive officer of 2401
a municipal corporation, or appointed by the elected chief 2402
executive officer of a county operating under an alternative 2403
form of county government or county charter, excluding members 2404
of boards, commissions, committees, authorities, councils, 2405
boards of trustees, task forces, and other such entities 2406
appointed by the chief executive officer, the office of the 2407
chief executive officer is considered to have ultimate 2408
responsibility for the award of the contract. 2409
(M)(1) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section do not apply 2410
to contracts awarded by the board of commissioners of the 2411
sinking fund, municipal legislative authorities, boards of 2412
education, boards of county commissioners, boards of township 2413

H. B. No. 250 Page 83
As Introduced
trustees, or other boards, commissions, committees, authorities, 2414
councils, boards of trustees, task forces, and other such 2415
entities created by law, by the supreme court or courts of 2416
appeals, by county courts consisting of more than one judge, 2417
courts of common pleas consisting of more than one judge, or 2418
municipal courts consisting of more than one judge, or by a 2419
division of any court if the division consists of more than one 2420
judge. This division shall apply to the specified entity only if 2421
the members of the entity act collectively in the award of a 2422
contract for goods or services. 2423
(2) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section do not apply to 2424
actions of the controlling board. 2425
(N)(1) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section apply to 2426
contributions made to the holder of a public office having 2427
ultimate responsibility for the award of a contract, or to the 2428
public officer's campaign committee, during the time the person 2429
holds the office and during any time such person was a candidate 2430
for the office. Those divisions do not apply to contributions 2431
made to, or to the campaign committee of, a candidate for or 2432
holder of the office other than the holder of the office at the 2433
time of the award of the contract. 2434
(2) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section do not apply to 2435
contributions of a partner, shareholder, administrator, 2436
executor, trustee, or owner of more than twenty per cent of a 2437
corporation or business trust made before the person held any of 2438
those positions or after the person ceased to hold any of those 2439
positions in the partnership, association, estate, trust, 2440
corporation, or business trust whose eligibility to be awarded a 2441
contract is being determined, nor to contributions of the 2442
person's spouse made before the person held any of those 2443

H. B. No. 250 Page 84
As Introduced
positions, after the person ceased to hold any of those 2444
positions, before the two were married, after the granting of a 2445
decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or 2446
after the granting of an order in an action brought solely for 2447
legal separation. Those divisions do not apply to contributions 2448
of the spouse of an individual whose eligibility to be awarded a 2449
contract is being determined made before the two were married, 2450
after the granting of a decree of divorce, dissolution of 2451
marriage, or annulment, or after the granting of an order in an 2452
action brought solely for legal separation. 2453
(O) No beneficiary of a campaign fund or other person 2454
shall convert for personal use, and no person shall knowingly 2455
give to a beneficiary of a campaign fund or any other person, 2456
for the beneficiary's or any other person's personal use, 2457
anything of value from the beneficiary's campaign fund, 2458
including, without limitation, payments to a beneficiary for 2459
services the beneficiary personally performs, except as 2460
reimbursement for any of the following: 2461
(1) Legitimate and verifiable prior campaign expenses 2462
incurred by the beneficiary; 2463
(2) Legitimate and verifiable ordinary and necessary prior 2464
expenses incurred by the beneficiary in connection with duties 2465
as the holder of a public office, including, without limitation, 2466
expenses incurred through participation in nonpartisan or 2467
bipartisan events if the participation of the holder of a public 2468
office would normally be expected; 2469
(3) Legitimate and verifiable ordinary and necessary prior 2470
expenses incurred by the beneficiary while doing any of the 2471
following: 2472

H. B. No. 250 Page 85
As Introduced
(a) Engaging in activities in support of or opposition to 2473
a candidate other than the beneficiary, political party, or 2474
ballot issue; 2475
(b) Raising funds for a political party, political action 2476
committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign 2477
fund, campaign committee, or other candidate; 2478
(c) Participating in the activities of a political party, 2479
political action committee, political contributing entity, 2480
legislative campaign fund, or campaign committee; 2481
(d) Attending a political party convention or other 2482
political meeting. 2483
For purposes of this division, an expense is incurred 2484
whenever a beneficiary has either made payment or is obligated 2485
to make payment, as by the use of a credit card or other credit 2486
procedure or by the use of goods or services received on 2487
account. 2488
(P) No beneficiary of a campaign fund shall knowingly 2489
accept, and no person shall knowingly give to the beneficiary of 2490
a campaign fund, reimbursement for an expense under division (O) 2491
of this section to the extent that the expense previously was 2492
reimbursed or paid from another source of funds. If an expense 2493
is reimbursed under division (O) of this section and is later 2494
paid or reimbursed, wholly or in part, from another source of 2495
funds, the beneficiary shall repay the reimbursement received 2496
under division (O) of this section to the extent of the payment 2497
made or reimbursement received from the other source. 2498
(Q) No candidate or public official or employee shall 2499
accept for personal or business use anything of value from a 2500
political party, political action committee, political 2501

H. B. No. 250 Page 86
As Introduced
contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or campaign 2502
committee other than the candidate's or public official's or 2503
employee's own campaign committee, and no person shall knowingly 2504
give to a candidate or public official or employee anything of 2505
value from a political party, political action committee, 2506
political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or 2507
such a campaign committee, except for the following: 2508
(1) Reimbursement for legitimate and verifiable ordinary 2509
and necessary prior expenses not otherwise prohibited by law 2510
incurred by the candidate or public official or employee while 2511
engaged in any legitimate activity of the political party, 2512
political action committee, political contributing entity, 2513
legislative campaign fund, or such campaign committee. Without 2514
limitation, reimbursable expenses under this division include 2515
those incurred while doing any of the following: 2516
(a) Engaging in activities in support of or opposition to 2517
another candidate, political party, or ballot issue; 2518
(b) Raising funds for a political party, legislative 2519
campaign fund, campaign committee, or another candidate; 2520
(c) Attending a political party convention or other 2521
political meeting. 2522
(2) Compensation not otherwise prohibited by law for 2523
actual and valuable personal services rendered under a written 2524
contract to the political party, political action committee, 2525
political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or 2526
such campaign committee for any legitimate activity of the 2527
political party, political action committee, political 2528
contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or such campaign 2529
committee. 2530

H. B. No. 250 Page 87
As Introduced
Reimbursable expenses under this division do not include, 2531
and it is a violation of this division for a candidate or public 2532
official or employee to accept, or for any person to knowingly 2533
give to a candidate or public official or employee from a 2534
political party, political action committee, political 2535
contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or campaign 2536
committee other than the candidate's or public official's or 2537
employee's own campaign committee, anything of value for 2538
activities primarily related to the candidate's or public 2539
official's or employee's own campaign for election, except for 2540
contributions to the candidate's or public official's or 2541
employee's campaign committee. 2542
For purposes of this division, an expense is incurred 2543
whenever a candidate or public official or employee has either 2544
made payment or is obligated to make payment, as by the use of a 2545
credit card or other credit procedure, or by the use of goods or 2546
services on account. 2547
(R)(1) Division (O) or (P) of this section does not 2548
prohibit a campaign committee from making direct advance or post 2549
payment from contributions to vendors for goods and services for 2550
which reimbursement is permitted under division (O) of this 2551
section, except that no campaign committee shall pay its 2552
candidate or other beneficiary for services personally performed 2553
by the candidate or other beneficiary. 2554
(2) If any expense that may be reimbursed under division 2555
(O), (P), or (Q) of this section is part of other expenses that 2556
may not be paid or reimbursed, the separation of the two types 2557
of expenses for the purpose of allocating for payment or 2558
reimbursement those expenses that may be paid or reimbursed may 2559
be by any reasonable accounting method, considering all of the 2560

H. B. No. 250 Page 88
As Introduced
surrounding circumstances. 2561
(3) For purposes of divisions (O), (P), and (Q) of this 2562
section, mileage allowance at a rate not greater than that 2563
allowed by the internal revenue service at the time the travel 2564
occurs may be paid instead of reimbursement for actual travel 2565
expenses allowable. 2566
(S)(1) As used in division (S) of this section: 2567
(a) "State elective office" has the same meaning as in 2568
section 3517.092 of the Revised Code. 2569
(b) "Federal office" means a federal office as defined in 2570
the Federal Election Campaign Act. 2571
(c) "Federal campaign committee" means a principal 2572
campaign committee or authorized committee as defined in the 2573
Federal Election Campaign Act. 2574
(2) No person who is a candidate for state elective office 2575
and who previously sought nomination or election to a federal 2576
office shall transfer any funds or assets from that person's 2577
federal campaign committee for nomination or election to the 2578
federal office to that person's campaign committee as a 2579
candidate for state elective office. 2580
(3) No campaign committee of a person who is a candidate 2581
for state elective office and who previously sought nomination 2582
or election to a federal office shall accept any funds or assets 2583
from that person's federal campaign committee for that person's 2584
nomination or election to the federal office. 2585
(T)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(6)(c) 2586
of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, a state or county 2587
political party shall not disburse moneys from any account other 2588

H. B. No. 250 Page 89
As Introduced
than a state candidate fund to make contributions to any of the 2589
following: 2590
(a) A state candidate fund; 2591
(b) A legislative campaign fund; 2592
(c) A campaign committee of a candidate for the office of 2593
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of 2594
state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state 2595
board of education, or member of the general assembly. 2596
(2) No state candidate fund, legislative campaign fund, or 2597
campaign committee of a candidate for any office described in 2598
division (T)(1)(c) of this section shall knowingly accept a 2599
contribution in violation of division (T)(1) of this section. 2600
(U) No person shall fail to file a statement required 2601
under section 3517.12 of the Revised Code. 2602
(V) No campaign committee shall fail to file a statement 2603
required under division (K)(3) of section 3517.10 of the Revised 2604
Code. 2605
(W)(1) No foreign national shall, directly or indirectly 2606
through any other person or entity, make a contribution, 2607
expenditure, or independent expenditure or promise, either 2608
expressly or implicitly, to make a contribution, expenditure, or 2609
independent expenditure in support of or opposition to a 2610
candidate for any elective office in this state, including an 2611
office of a political party. 2612
(2) No candidate, campaign committee, political action 2613
committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign 2614
fund, state candidate fund, political party, or separate 2615
segregated fund shall solicit or accept a contribution, 2616

H. B. No. 250 Page 90
As Introduced
expenditure, or independent expenditure from a foreign national. 2617
The secretary of state may direct any candidate, committee, 2618
entity, fund, or party that accepts a contribution, expenditure, 2619
or independent expenditure in violation of this division to 2620
return the contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure 2621
or, if it is not possible to return the contribution, 2622
expenditure, or independent expenditure, then to return instead 2623
the value of it, to the contributor. 2624
(3) As used in division (W) of this section, "foreign 2625
national" has means any of the same meaning as in following: 2626
(a) A "foreign national" for purposes of section 441e(b) 2627
of the Federal Election Campaign Act; 2628
(b) A corporation that is owned twenty per cent or more by 2629
persons or entities whose domicile, if the owner is a 2630
corporation, or whose citizenship, if the owner is an individual 2631
or an unincorporated association or entity, is outside the 2632
United States; 2633
(c) A corporation that is owned five per cent or more by 2634
any one person or entity whose domicile, if the owner is a 2635
corporation, or whose citizenship, if the owner is an individual 2636
or an unincorporated association or entity, is outside the 2637
United States. 2638
(X)(1) No state or county political party shall transfer 2639
any moneys from its restricted fund to any account of the 2640
political party into which contributions may be made or from 2641
which contributions or expenditures may be made. 2642
(2)(a) No state or county political party shall deposit a 2643
contribution or contributions that it receives into its 2644
restricted fund. 2645

H. B. No. 250 Page 91
As Introduced
(b) No state or county political party shall make a 2646
contribution or an expenditure from its restricted fund. 2647
(3)(a) No corporation or labor organization shall make a 2648
gift or gifts from the corporation's or labor organization's 2649
money or property aggregating more than ten thousand dollars to 2650
any one state or county political party for the party's 2651
restricted fund in a calendar year. 2652
(b) No state or county political party shall accept a gift 2653
or gifts for the party's restricted fund aggregating more than 2654
ten thousand dollars from any one corporation or labor 2655
organization in a calendar year. 2656
(4) No state or county political party shall transfer any 2657
moneys in the party's restricted fund to any other state or 2658
county political party. 2659
(5) No state or county political party shall knowingly 2660
fail to file a statement required under section 3517.1012 of the 2661
Revised Code. 2662
(Y) The administrator of workers' compensation and the 2663
employees of the bureau of workers' compensation shall not 2664
conduct any business with or award any contract, other than one 2665
awarded by competitive bidding, for the purchase of goods 2666
costing more than five hundred dollars or services costing more 2667
than five hundred dollars to any individual, partnership, 2668
association, including, without limitation, a professional 2669
association organized under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, 2670
estate, or trust, if the individual has made, or the 2671
individual's spouse has made, or any partner, shareholder, 2672
administrator, executor, or trustee, or the spouses of any of 2673
those individuals has made, as an individual, within the two 2674

H. B. No. 250 Page 92
As Introduced
previous calendar years, one or more contributions totaling in 2675
excess of one thousand dollars to the campaign committee of the 2676
governor or lieutenant governor or to the campaign committee of 2677
any candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor. 2678
(Z) The administrator of workers' compensation and the 2679
employees of the bureau of workers' compensation shall not 2680
conduct business with or award any contract, other than one 2681
awarded by competitive bidding, for the purchase of goods 2682
costing more than five hundred dollars or services costing more 2683
than five hundred dollars to a corporation or business trust, 2684
except a professional association organized under Chapter 1785. 2685
of the Revised Code, if an owner of more than twenty per cent of 2686
the corporation or business trust, or the spouse of the owner, 2687
has made, as an individual, within the two previous calendar 2688
years, taking into consideration only owners for all of such 2689
period, one or more contributions totaling in excess of one 2690
thousand dollars to the campaign committee of the governor or 2691
lieutenant governor or to the campaign committee of any 2692
candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor. 2693
Sec. 3599.03. (A)(1) Except to carry on activities 2694
specified in sections 3517.082, 3517.101, 3517.105, and 2695
3517.1011, division (A)(2) of section 3517.1012, division (B) of 2696
section 3517.1013, division (C)(1) of section 3517.1014, and 2697
section 3599.031 of the Revised Code and except as otherwise 2698
provided in divisions (D), (E), and (F) of this section, no 2699
corporation, no nonprofit corporation, and no labor 2700
organization, directly or indirectly, shall pay or use, or 2701
offer, advise, consent, or agree to pay or use, the 2702
corporation's money or property, or the labor organization's 2703
money, including dues, initiation fees, or other assessments 2704
paid by members, or property, for or in aid of or opposition to 2705

H. B. No. 250 Page 93
As Introduced
a political party, a candidate for election or nomination to 2706
public office, a political action committee including a 2707
political action committee of the corporation or labor 2708
organization, a legislative campaign fund, or any organization 2709
that supports or opposes any such candidate, or for any partisan 2710
political purpose, shall violate any law requiring the filing of 2711
an affidavit or statement respecting such use of those funds, or 2712
shall pay or use the corporation's or labor organization's money 2713
for the expenses of a social fund-raising event for its 2714
political action committee if an employee's or labor 2715
organization member's right to attend such an event is 2716
predicated on the employee's or member's contribution to the 2717
corporation's or labor organization's political action 2718
committee. 2719
(2) Whoever violates division (A)(1) of this section shall 2720
be fined not less than five hundred nor more than five thousand 2721
dollars. 2722
(B)(1) No officer, stockholder, attorney, or agent of a 2723
corporation or nonprofit corporation, no member, including an 2724
officer, attorney, or agent, of a labor organization, and no 2725
candidate, political party official, or other individual shall 2726
knowingly aid, advise, solicit, or receive money or other 2727
property in violation of division (A)(1) of this section. 2728
(2) Whoever violates division (B)(1) of this section shall 2729
be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or imprisoned not 2730
more than one year, or both. 2731
(C) A Except as otherwise provided in division (W) of 2732
section 3517.13 of the Revised Code, a corporation, a nonprofit 2733
corporation, or a labor organization may use its funds or 2734
property for or in aid of or opposition to a proposed or 2735

H. B. No. 250 Page 94
As Introduced
certified ballot issue. Such use of funds or property shall be 2736
reported on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. Reports 2737
of contributions in connection with statewide ballot issues 2738
shall be filed with the secretary of state. Reports of 2739
contributions in connection with local issues shall be filed 2740
with the board of elections of the most populous county of the 2741
district in which the issue is submitted or to be submitted to 2742
the electors. Reports made pursuant to this division shall be 2743
filed by the times specified in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of 2744
section accordance with sections 3517.10 and 3517.105 of the 2745
Revised Code. 2746
(D) A nonprofit corporation that is a membership 2747
association and that is exempt from taxation under subsection 2748
501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code may transfer 2749
contributions received as part of a regular dues payment from 2750
member partnerships and other unincorporated businesses as 2751
defined in division (I)(6) (F)(4) of section 3517.10 of the 2752
Revised Code to its political action committee. Contributions 2753
received under this division shall be itemized and allocated to 2754
individuals subject to contribution limits. 2755
(E)(1) Any gift made pursuant to section 3517.101 of the 2756
Revised Code does not constitute a violation of this section or 2757
of any other section of the Revised Code. 2758
(2) Any gift made pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2759
3517.1012 of the Revised Code does not constitute a violation of 2760
this section. 2761
(3) Any gift made pursuant to division (B) of section 2762
3517.1013 of the Revised Code does not constitute a violation of 2763
this section. 2764

H. B. No. 250 Page 95
As Introduced
(4) Any donation made pursuant to division (C)(1) of 2765
section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code does not constitute a 2766
violation of this section. 2767
(F) Any compensation or fees paid by a financial 2768
institution to a state political party for services rendered 2769
pursuant to division (B) of section 3517.19 of the Revised Code 2770
do not constitute a violation of this section or of any other 2771
section of the Revised Code. 2772
(G)(1) The use by a nonprofit corporation of its money or 2773
property for communicating information for a purpose specified 2774
in division (A) of this section is not a violation of that 2775
division if the stockholders, members, donors, trustees, or 2776
officers of the nonprofit corporation are the predominant 2777
recipients of the communication. 2778
(2) The placement of a campaign sign on the property of a 2779
corporation, nonprofit corporation, or labor organization is not 2780
a use of property in violation of division (A) of this section 2781
by that corporation, nonprofit corporation, or labor 2782
organization. 2783
(3) The use by a corporation or labor organization of its 2784
money or property for communicating information for a purpose 2785
specified in division (A) of this section is not a violation of 2786
that division if it is not a communication made by mass 2787
broadcast such as radio or television or made by advertising in 2788
a newspaper of general circulation but is a communication sent 2789
exclusively to members, employees, officers, or trustees of that 2790
labor organization or shareholders, employees, officers, or 2791
directors of that corporation or to members of the immediate 2792
families of any such individuals or if the communication 2793
intended to be so sent exclusively is unintentionally sent as 2794

H. B. No. 250 Page 96
As Introduced
well to a de minimis number of other individuals. 2795
(H) In addition to the laws listed in division (A) of 2796
section 4117.10 of the Revised Code that prevail over 2797
conflicting agreements between employee organizations and public 2798
employers, this section prevails over any conflicting provisions 2799
of agreements between labor organizations and public employers 2800
that are entered into on or after March 31, 2005, pursuant to 2801
Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. 2802
(I) As used in this section, "labor organization" has the 2803
same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. 2804
Sec. 3921.22. (A) A fraternal benefit society shall hold, 2805
invest, and disburse all assets for the use and benefit of the 2806
society. No member or beneficiary shall have or acquire 2807
individual rights to the assets, or be entitled to any 2808
apportionment on the surrender of any part of the assets, except 2809
as provided in the benefit contract. 2810
(B) A society may create, maintain, invest, disburse, and 2811
apply any special fund or funds necessary to carry out any 2812
purpose permitted by the laws of the society. No society shall, 2813
directly or indirectly, pay or use, or offer, consent, or agree 2814
to pay or use, any of its funds, money, or property for or in 2815
aid of any political party, campaign committee, political action 2816
committee, continuing association, political contributing 2817
entity, or any other political organization. 2818
(C) A society may, pursuant to resolution of its supreme 2819
governing body, establish and operate one or more separate 2820
accounts and issue contracts on a variable basis, subject to the 2821
provisions of law regulating life insurers that establish such 2822
accounts and issue such contracts including those described in 2823

H. B. No. 250 Page 97
As Introduced
section 3911.011 of the Revised Code. To the extent the society 2824
considers it necessary in order to comply with any applicable 2825
federal or state law, or any rule issued under that law, the 2826
society may do any of the following: 2827
(1) Adopt special procedures for the conduct of the 2828
business and affairs of a separate account; 2829
(2) For persons having beneficial interests in the 2830
account, provide special voting and other rights, including 2831
special rights and procedures relating to investment policy, 2832
investment advisory services, selection of certified public 2833
accountants, and selection of a committee to manage the business 2834
and affairs of the account; 2835
(3) Issue contracts on a variable basis to which divisions 2836
(B) and (D) of section 3921.19 of the Revised Code do not apply. 2837
Sec. 4503.03. (A)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (B) 2838
of this section, the registrar of motor vehicles may designate 2839
one or more of the following persons to act as a deputy 2840
registrar in each county: 2841
(i) The county auditor in any county; 2842
(ii) The clerk of a court of common pleas in any county; 2843
(iii) An individual; 2844
(iv) A nonprofit corporation as defined in division (C) of 2845
section 1702.01 of the Revised Code. 2846
All fees collected and retained by a clerk for conducting 2847
deputy registrar services shall be paid into the county treasury 2848
to the credit of the certificate of title administration fund 2849
created under section 325.33 of the Revised Code. 2850

H. B. No. 250 Page 98
As Introduced
(b) As part of the selection process in awarding a deputy 2851
registrar contract, the registrar shall consider the customer 2852
service performance record of any person previously awarded a 2853
deputy registrar contract pursuant to division (A)(1) of this 2854
section. 2855
(2) Deputy registrars shall accept applications for the 2856
annual license tax for any vehicle not taxed under section 2857
4503.63 of the Revised Code and shall assign distinctive numbers 2858
in the same manner as the registrar. Such deputies shall be 2859
located in such locations as the registrar sees fit. Except as 2860
provided in division (A)(3) of this section, there shall be at 2861
least one deputy registrar in each county. 2862
(3) The registrar need not appoint a deputy registrar in a 2863
county to which all of the following apply: 2864
(a) No individual, nonprofit corporation, or, where 2865
applicable, clerk of court of common pleas participates in the 2866
competitive selection process to be designated as a deputy 2867
registrar; 2868
(b) Neither the county auditor nor the clerk of court of 2869
common pleas agrees to be designated as a deputy registrar; 2870
(c) No individual or nonprofit corporation agrees to be 2871
designated as a deputy registrar; 2872
(d) No deputy registrar operating an existing deputy 2873
registrar agency in another county agrees to be designated as 2874
the deputy registrar for that county. 2875
(4) The registrar may reestablish a deputy registrar in 2876
any county without a deputy registrar if any of the following 2877
apply: 2878

H. B. No. 250 Page 99
As Introduced
(a) The county auditor requests to be designated as a 2879
deputy registrar; 2880
(b) The clerk of court of common pleas requests to be 2881
designated as a deputy registrar; 2882
(c) A deputy registrar operating an existing deputy 2883
registrar agency in another county requests to be designated as 2884
a deputy registrar for that county; 2885
(d) A qualified individual or nonprofit corporation 2886
requests to be designated as a deputy registrar. In the event 2887
that two or more qualified individuals, nonprofit corporations, 2888
or a combination thereof, request to be designated as a deputy 2889
registrar, the registrar may make the designation through the 2890
competitive selection process. 2891
Deputy registrar contracts are subject to the provisions 2892
of division (B) of section 125.081 of the Revised Code. 2893
(B)(1) The registrar shall not designate any person to act 2894
as a deputy registrar under division (A)(1) of this section if 2895
the person or, where applicable, the person's spouse or a member 2896
of the person's immediate family has made, within the current 2897
calendar year or any one of the previous three calendar years, 2898
one or more contributions totaling in excess of one hundred 2899
dollars to any person or entity included in division (A)(2) of 2900
section 4503.033 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, 2901
"immediate family" has the same meaning as in division (D) of 2902
section 102.01 of the Revised Code, and "entity" includes any 2903
political party and any "continuing association""political 2904
contributing entity" as defined in division (C)(4) of section 2905
3517.01 of the Revised Code or "political action committee" as 2906
defined in division (C)(8) of that section that is primarily 2907

H. B. No. 250 Page 100
As Introduced
associated with that political party. For purposes of this 2908
division, contributions to any continuing association political 2909
contributing entity or any political action committee that is 2910
primarily associated with a political party shall be aggregated 2911
with contributions to that political party. 2912
The contribution limitations contained in this division do 2913
not apply to any county auditor or clerk of a court of common 2914
pleas. A county auditor or clerk of a court of common pleas is 2915
not required to file the disclosure statement or pay the filing 2916
fee required under section 4503.033 of the Revised Code. The 2917
limitations of this division also do not apply to a deputy 2918
registrar who, subsequent to being awarded a deputy registrar 2919
contract, is elected to an office of a political subdivision. 2920
(2) The registrar shall not designate either of the 2921
following to act as a deputy registrar: 2922
(a) Any elected public official other than a county 2923
auditor or, as authorized by division (A)(1) of this section, a 2924
clerk of a court of common pleas, acting in an official 2925
capacity, except that, the registrar shall continue and may 2926
renew a contract with any deputy registrar who, subsequent to 2927
being awarded a deputy registrar contract, is elected to an 2928
office of a political subdivision; 2929
(b) Any person holding a current, valid contract to 2930
conduct motor vehicle inspections under section 3704.14 of the 2931
Revised Code. 2932
(3) As used in division (B) of this section, "political 2933
subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 3501.01 of the 2934
Revised Code. 2935
(C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this 2936

H. B. No. 250 Page 101
As Introduced
section, deputy registrars are independent contractors and 2937
neither they nor their employees are employees of this state, 2938
except that nothing in this section shall affect the status of 2939
county auditors or clerks of courts of common pleas as public 2940
officials, nor the status of their employees as employees of any 2941
of the counties of this state, which are political subdivisions 2942
of this state. Each deputy registrar shall be responsible for 2943
the payment of all unemployment compensation premiums, all 2944
workers' compensation premiums, social security contributions, 2945
and any and all taxes for which the deputy registrar is legally 2946
responsible. Each deputy registrar shall comply with all 2947
applicable federal, state, and local laws requiring the 2948
withholding of income taxes or other taxes from the compensation 2949
of the deputy registrar's employees. Each deputy registrar shall 2950
maintain during the entire term of the deputy registrar's 2951
contract a policy of business liability insurance satisfactory 2952
to the registrar and shall hold the department of public safety, 2953
the director of public safety, the bureau of motor vehicles, and 2954
the registrar harmless upon any and all claims for damages 2955
arising out of the operation of the deputy registrar agency. 2956
(2) For purposes of Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code, 2957
determinations concerning the employment of deputy registrars 2958
and their employees shall be made under Chapter 4141. of the 2959
Revised Code. 2960
(D)(1) With the approval of the director, the registrar 2961
shall adopt rules governing deputy registrars. The rules shall 2962
do all of the following: 2963
(a) Establish requirements governing the terms of the 2964
contract between the registrar and each deputy registrar and the 2965
services to be performed; 2966

H. B. No. 250 Page 102
As Introduced
(b) Establish requirements governing the amount of bond to 2967
be given as provided in this section; 2968
(c) Establish requirements governing the size and location 2969
of the deputy's office; 2970
(d) Establish requirements governing the leasing of 2971
equipment necessary to conduct the vision screenings required 2972
under section 4507.12 of the Revised Code and training in the 2973
use of the equipment; 2974
(e) Encourage every deputy registrar to inform the public 2975
of the location of the deputy registrar's office and hours of 2976
operation by means of public service announcements; 2977
(f) Allow any deputy registrar to advertise in regard to 2978
the operation of the deputy registrar's office, including 2979
allowing nonprofit corporations operating as a deputy registrar 2980
to advertise that a specified amount of proceeds collected by 2981
the nonprofit corporation are directed to a specified charitable 2982
organization or philanthropic cause; 2983
(g) Specify the hours the deputy's office is to be open to 2984
the public and require as a minimum that one deputy's office in 2985
each county be open to the public for at least four hours each 2986
weekend, provided that if only one deputy's office is located 2987
within the boundary of the county seat, that office is the 2988
office that shall be open for the four-hour period each weekend; 2989
(h) Specify that every deputy registrar, upon request, 2990
provide any person with information about the location and 2991
office hours of all deputy registrars in the county; 2992
(i) Allow a deputy registrar contract to be awarded to a 2993
nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of this state; 2994

H. B. No. 250 Page 103
As Introduced
(j) Establish procedures for a deputy registrar to request 2995
the authority to collect reinstatement fees under sections 2996
4507.1612, 4507.45, 4509.101, 4509.81, 4510.10, 4510.22, 2997
4510.72, and 4511.191 of the Revised Code and to transmit the 2998
reinstatement fees and two dollars of the service fee collected 2999
under those sections. The registrar shall ensure that at least 3000
one deputy registrar in each county has the necessary equipment 3001
and is able to accept reinstatement fees. The registrar shall 3002
deposit the service fees received from a deputy registrar under 3003
those sections into the public safety - highway purposes fund 3004
created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code and shall use the 3005
money for deputy registrar equipment necessary in connection 3006
with accepting reinstatement fees. 3007
(k) Establish standards for a deputy registrar, when the 3008
deputy registrar is not a county auditor or a clerk of a court 3009
of common pleas, to sell advertising rights to third party 3010
businesses to be placed in the deputy registrar's office; 3011
(l) Allow any deputy registrar that is not a county 3012
auditor or a clerk of a court of common pleas to operate a 3013
vending machine; 3014
(m) Establish such other requirements as the registrar and 3015
director consider necessary to provide a high level of service. 3016
(2) The rules may allow both of the following: 3017
(a) The registrar to award a contract to a deputy 3018
registrar to operate more than one deputy registrar's office if 3019
determined by the registrar to be practical; 3020
(b) A nonprofit corporation formed for the purposes of 3021
providing automobile-related services to its members or the 3022
public and that provides such services from more than one 3023

H. B. No. 250 Page 104
As Introduced
location in this state to operate a deputy registrar office at 3024
any location. 3025
(3) As a daily adjustment, the bureau of motor vehicles 3026
shall credit to a deputy registrar the amount established under 3027
section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each damaged license 3028
plate or validation sticker the deputy registrar replaces as a 3029
service to a member of the public. 3030
(4)(a) With the prior approval of the registrar, each 3031
deputy registrar may conduct at the location of the deputy 3032
registrar's office any business that is consistent with the 3033
functions of a deputy registrar and that is not specifically 3034
mandated or authorized by this or another chapter of the Revised 3035
Code or by implementing rules of the registrar. 3036
(b) In accordance with guidelines the director of public 3037
safety shall establish, a deputy registrar may operate or 3038
contract for the operation of a vending machine at a deputy 3039
registrar location if products of the vending machine are 3040
consistent with the functions of a deputy registrar. 3041
(c) A deputy registrar may enter into an agreement with 3042
the Ohio turnpike and infrastructure commission pursuant to 3043
division (A)(11) of section 5537.04 of the Revised Code for the 3044
purpose of allowing the general public to acquire from the 3045
deputy registrar the electronic toll collection devices that are 3046
used under the multi-jurisdiction electronic toll collection 3047
agreement between the Ohio turnpike and infrastructure 3048
commission and any other entities or agencies that participate 3049
in such an agreement. The approval of the registrar is not 3050
necessary if a deputy registrar engages in this activity. 3051
(5) As used in this section and in section 4507.01 of the 3052

H. B. No. 250 Page 105
As Introduced
Revised Code, "nonprofit corporation" has the same meaning as in 3053
section 1702.01 of the Revised Code. 3054
(E)(1) Unless otherwise terminated and except for interim 3055
contracts lasting not longer than one year, contracts with 3056
deputy registrars shall be entered into through a competitive 3057
selection process and shall be limited in duration as follows: 3058
(a) For contracts entered into between July 1, 1996 and 3059
June 29, 2014, for a period of not less than two years, but not 3060
more than three years; 3061
(b) For contracts entered into on or after June 29, 2014, 3062
for a period of five years, unless the registrar determines that 3063
a shorter contract term is appropriate for a particular deputy 3064
registrar. 3065
(2) All contracts with deputy registrars shall expire on 3066
the last Saturday of June in the year of their expiration. Prior 3067
to the expiration of any deputy registrar contract, the 3068
registrar, with the approval of the director, may award a one- 3069
year contract extension to any deputy registrar who has provided 3070
exemplary service based upon objective performance evaluations. 3071
(3)(a) The auditor of state may examine the accounts, 3072
reports, systems, and other data of each deputy registrar at 3073
least every two years. The registrar, with the approval of the 3074
director, shall immediately remove a deputy who violates any 3075
provision of the Revised Code related to the duties as a deputy, 3076
any rule adopted by the registrar, or a term of the deputy's 3077
contract with the registrar. The registrar also may remove a 3078
deputy who, in the opinion of the registrar, has engaged in any 3079
conduct that is either unbecoming to one representing this state 3080
or is inconsistent with the efficient operation of the deputy's 3081

H. B. No. 250 Page 106
As Introduced
office. 3082
(b) If the registrar, with the approval of the director, 3083
determines that there is good cause to believe that a deputy 3084
registrar or a person proposing for a deputy registrar contract 3085
has engaged in any conduct that would require the denial or 3086
termination of the deputy registrar contract, the registrar may 3087
require the production of books, records, and papers as the 3088
registrar determines are necessary, and may take the depositions 3089
of witnesses residing within or outside the state in the same 3090
manner as is prescribed by law for the taking of depositions in 3091
civil actions in the court of common pleas, and for that purpose 3092
the registrar may issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena 3093
duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records, or 3094
papers, directed to the sheriff of the county where the witness 3095
resides or is found. Such a subpoena shall be served and 3096
returned in the same manner as a subpoena in a criminal case is 3097
served and returned. The fees of the sheriff shall be the same 3098
as that allowed in the court of common pleas in criminal cases. 3099
Witnesses shall be paid the fees and mileage provided for under 3100
section 119.094 of the Revised Code. The fees and mileage shall 3101
be paid from the fund in the state treasury for the use of the 3102
agency in the same manner as other expenses of the agency are 3103
paid. 3104
In any case of disobedience or neglect of any subpoena 3105
served on any person or the refusal of any witness to testify to 3106
any matter regarding which the witness lawfully may be 3107
interrogated, the court of common pleas of any county where the 3108
disobedience, neglect, or refusal occurs or any judge of that 3109
court, on application by the registrar, shall compel obedience 3110
by attachment proceedings for contempt, as in the case of 3111
disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from that 3112

H. B. No. 250 Page 107
As Introduced
court, or a refusal to testify in that court. 3113
(4) Nothing in division (E) of this section shall be 3114
construed to require a hearing of any nature prior to the 3115
termination of any deputy registrar contract by the registrar, 3116
with the approval of the director, for cause. 3117
(F) Except as provided in section 2743.03 of the Revised 3118
Code, no court, other than the court of common pleas of Franklin 3119
county, has jurisdiction of any action against the department of 3120
public safety, the director, the bureau, or the registrar to 3121
restrain the exercise of any power or authority, or to entertain 3122
any action for declaratory judgment, in the selection and 3123
appointment of, or contracting with, deputy registrars. Neither 3124
the department, the director, the bureau, nor the registrar is 3125
liable in any action at law for damages sustained by any person 3126
because of any acts of the department, the director, the bureau, 3127
or the registrar, or of any employee of the department or 3128
bureau, in the performance of official duties in the selection 3129
and appointment of, and contracting with, deputy registrars. 3130
(G) The registrar shall assign to each deputy registrar a 3131
series of numbers sufficient to supply the demand at all times 3132
in the area the deputy registrar serves, and the registrar shall 3133
keep a record in the registrar's office of the numbers within 3134
the series assigned. Except as otherwise provided in section 3135
3.061 of the Revised Code, each deputy shall be required to give 3136
bond in the amount of at least twenty-five thousand dollars, or 3137
in such higher amount as the registrar determines necessary, 3138
based on a uniform schedule of bond amounts established by the 3139
registrar and determined by the volume of registrations handled 3140
by the deputy. The form of the bond shall be prescribed by the 3141
registrar. The bonds required of deputy registrars, in the 3142

H. B. No. 250 Page 108
As Introduced
discretion of the registrar, may be individual or schedule bonds 3143
or may be included in any blanket bond coverage carried by the 3144
department. 3145
(H) Each deputy registrar shall keep a file of each 3146
application received by the deputy and shall register that motor 3147
vehicle with the name and address of its owner. 3148
(I) Upon request, a deputy registrar shall make the 3149
physical inspection of a motor vehicle and issue the physical 3150
inspection certificate required in section 4505.061 of the 3151
Revised Code. 3152
(J) Each deputy registrar shall file a report semiannually 3153
with the registrar of motor vehicles listing the number of 3154
applicants for licenses the deputy has served, the number of 3155
voter registration applications the deputy has completed and 3156
transmitted to the board of elections, and the number of voter 3157
registration applications declined. 3158
Section 2. That existing sections 3517.01, 3517.08, 3159
3517.10, 3517.102, 3517.105, 3517.106, 3517.107, 3517.13, 3160
3599.03, 3921.22, and 4503.03 of the Revised Code are hereby 3161
repealed. 3162
Section 3. This act shall be known as the Ohio Anti- 3163
Corruption Act. 3164